PREPARING  FOR  THE  WORKFORCE  TRANSITION 

AT  KENNEDY  SPACE  CENTER 

S.  HRG.  110–1188 

FIELD  HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SPACE, AERONAUTICS, AND 

RELATED SCIENCES 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

JUNE  23,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

77–459 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director,  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SPACE,  AERONAUTICS,  AND  RELATED  SCIENCES 

BILL  NELSON,  Florida,  Chairman 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana,  Ranking 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on June 23, 2008  ...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Nelson  ..................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Berridge, Randy, President, Florida High Tech Corridor Council  .......................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Griffin,  Hon.  Michael  D.,  Administrator,  National  Aeronautics  and  Space 
Administration;  accompanied  by  William  H.  Gerstenmaier,  Associate  Ad-
ministrator, Space Operations Mission Directorate, NASA; and Doug Cooke, 
Associate Administrator, Exploration Systems Mission Directorate, NASA  ...
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Martinez, Hon. Mel, U.S. Senator from Florida  ....................................................
Rice, Lisa, President, Brevard Workforce Development Board, Inc.  ...................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Weatherman, Lynda L., President and CEO, Economic Development Commis-
sion of Florida’s Space Coast  ...............................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Kohler, Steve, President, Space Florida 

APPENDIX 

Bergman,  Alan,  Republican  Candidate,  U.S.  House  of  Representatives,  Flor-
ida 15th District, prepared statement  ................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Mary  L.  Landrieu  to  Hon. 
Michael D. Griffin  ................................................................................................

Page 
1 
1 

35 
36 

5 
7 
38 
39 
3 
32 
34 

28 
30 

49 

50 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

PREPARING  FOR  THE  WORKFORCE 

TRANSITION  AT  KENNEDY  SPACE  CENTER 

MONDAY,  JUNE  23,  2008 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SPACE, AERONAUTICS, AND RELATED 
SCIENCES, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The Subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 9 a.m. in Commis-
sion  Room,  Cape  Canaveral  Port  Authority  Maritime  Center,  445 
Challenger  Road,  Cape  Canaveral,  Florida,  Hon.  Bill  Nelson, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Cape Canaveral, FL. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Members 

of 

the  State 

Senator  NELSON.  The  meeting  of  the  Subcommittee  on  Space, 
Aeronautics, and Related Sciences, of Senate Commerce Committee 
will  come  to  order.  I  want  to  thank  all  of  you  for  coming.  I  want 
to  thank  those  thousand  people  outside  that  came  to  lend  their 
support  to  the  continuation  of  America’s  space  program.  I  want  to 
thank  Joe  Metheny,  the  Chairman  of  Port  Canaveral,  and  the 
members  of  the  Port  Authority.  We  have  several  elected  officials 
here,  and  I  have  a  list  that  I’ve  been  given,  so  I’m  going  to  recog-
nize  those  on  the  list.  If  you’re  not  on  the  list,  then  it’s  because 
somebody didn’t give me that name. 

In  addition  to  the  Port  Commission,  Brevard  County  Commis-
sioners Truman G. Scarborough, Jr., the Chairman, Chuck Nelson, 
Jackie Colon, Mary Bolin, and Helen Volt. 

legislature  delegation;  Senator 
Haridopolos,  the  Chairman  of  the  Delegation,  Representative  Alt-
man,  Representative  Sansom,  Representative  Poppel,  and  many 
other officials who have come from all around, because of the enor-
mity of concern that this community has with the economic devas-
tation that has occurred in the past due to layoffs in the aftermath 
of  the  Apollo  program  and  their  potential  to  occur  in  the  future. 
This is one of the reasons of having this hearing here today. 

I  have  offered  to  have  this  hearing,  as  well,  in  New  Orleans,  in 
the  Michoud  National  facility,  which  is  the  other  facility  which  is 
projected  to  receive  a  huge  reduction,  concurrent  to  their  existing 
workforce.  We  are  just  trying  to  work  out  the  details  with  the  two 
Senators from Louisiana for that. 

In  the  projections,  the  Johnson  Space  Center  in  Houston,  is  also 
slated  for  some  substantial  cuts,  but  those  come  later  on  in  the 
planning process. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

2 

It’s  the  Kennedy  Space  Center  where  the  projected  figures  re-
leased  by  NASA,  could  be  as  much  as  6,400,  on  the  high  side,  or 
about  5,300  on  the  low  side.  That  is  what  we  have  to  address 
today. 

I  am  delighted  that  Senator  Martinez  is  here,  my  colleague  in 
the  Senate.  The  Senator  does  not  sit  on  the  Commerce  Committee 
or  on  our  Space  Subcommittee,  but  he  and  I  share  other  commit-
tees, including the Senate Armed Services, and obviously he has an 
interest in the subject matter today. 

I need you all to understand that the way we run a Senate hear-
ing  is  different  from  how  we  would  normally  conduct  a  Town  Hall 
meeting.  There  is  formal  testimony,  we  have  a  court  reporter  that 
is  recording  the  proceedings,  and  there  will  be  formal  questions 
asked  of  the  two  panels  that  we  have.  What  we  are  trying  to  do 
today  is  to  get  a  better  understanding  of  the  workforce  challenges 
that  we’re  going  to  be  facing,  and  how  we  identify  solutions  to 
those  challenges.  I  know  we’re  going  to  look  today  at  the  Kennedy 
Center. These cuts are going throughout, and it’s an enormous time 
of not only unrest, and uncertainty, for folks because of their liveli-
hood and their jobs, but it’s a very important transition on our abil-
ity to have access to space. 

Naturally,  the  fact  that  we’re  going  to  be  laying  off  people  here 
so that we can hire Russians to build Soviet spacecraft, so the U.S. 
Government can spend hundreds of millions of dollars buying rides 
to  the  International  Space  Station,  a  $100  billion  investment,  $75 
billion  of  which  is  the  United  States  investment,  is  of  concern  to 
people. 

But  it  is  what  it  is.  We’ve  been  trying,  in  the  Senate,  and  I  can 
name  you  a  bunch  of  other  Senators,  Senator  Mikulski,  Senator 
Shelby,  Senator  Landrieu,  so,  you  see,  it’s  bipartisan,  Senator 
Hutchison  from  Texas,  to  get  an  additional  billion  dollars  into  last 
year’s  NASA  budget,  only  to  have  the  White  House  Budget  Office 
say, ‘‘Nyet.’’ 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  NELSON.  And  I  want  you  to  know  I  don’t  blame  these 
folks  here.  I  want  you  to  know  that  my  personal  opinion  is,  Dr. 
Griffin is doing a very good job under a very difficult circumstance. 
First  of  all,  he’s  a  rocket  scientist.  He  knows  something  about 
space.  And  that’s  important.  And  two,  he  has  a  sense  of  humility 
which, I think, is important in a leader, because he brings the team 
approach.  And  if  ever  there  has  been  a  team  approach,  it’s  the 
American space program. I mean, just look at the miracles that we 
have  pulled  off  in  the  past.  And  I  say  we,  because  it’s  collectively 
we as the space team. 

You  know,  I  had  one  of  the  greatest  times  I  ever  had,  having 
Gene Kranz come in. And I mean, I just didn’t want to let him go, 
just asked him question after question. As the mission manager of 
Apollo  13  he’s  the  one  that  coined  that  famous  phrase,  ‘‘Failure  is 
not  an  option.’’  They  basically  brought  back  three  astronauts  that 
we  would  have  never  seen  again,  and  they  brought  them  home 
safely. 

That’s  the  kind  of  can-do  spirit  and  teamwork  that  is  so  much 
of a hallmark of NASA. And that’s what we don’t want to lose. And 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

3 

yet,  people,  to  use  a  Southern  expression,  get  down  in  the  mouth, 
when you see potentially huge layoffs. 

Now,  we’ve  tried,  this  bipartisan  group  that  I  just  named,  have 
been trying to get extra money into NASA. It was cut out from last 
year’s  budget,  we  tried  again  this  year,  but  we’re  not  having  suc-
cess.  Because  it’s  going  to  be  nixed,  at  the  end  of  the  day,  by  the 
White House Budget Office. 

So,  again  I  get  to  the  point  that  in  America  you  change  policy 
by ballots, not bullets. And you have an opportunity now in an elec-
tion,  of  changing  governmental  policy  with  regard  to  America’s 
space program. 

The  problem  is,  that  by  the  time  the  new  Administration  gets 
into place, an awful lot of time has been expended, and a lot of de-
cisions  that  will  have  already  been  made  that  would  be  irrevers-
ible. And we’re going to get into some of that. 

So,  Dr.  Griffin,  we  welcome  you,  and  I  want  you  to  know  how 
much  I  appreciate  you  coming  down  here.  This  is  not  a  session  to 
beat  you  up,  or  Bill,  or  Mr.  Cook.  This  is  a  session  to  learn,  and 
to  learn  together.  Most  of  you  who  are  in  here,  haven’t  seen  the 
visuals,  of  1,000  people  out  there,  all  with  handmade  signs,  that 
are concerned, not only about their jobs, but about the future of our 
space program, and how we will have human access to space. 

We’re  concerned  about  losing  the  skills,  the  knowledge,  the  cor-
porate  memory,  of  all  of  these  contracted  partners.  We  learned  a 
lot  of  lessons,  when  we  stepped  down  after  Apollo.  Huge  layoffs,  a 
lot  of  lost  corporate  memory  that  took  us  a  long  time  to  work  our 
way back to. 

Now,  before  I  turn  it  over  to  Senator  Martinez,  again,  this  is  an 
official  Senate  hearing.  This  will  become  a  part  of  the  official  Sen-
ate record, and I want to recognize my colleague, Senator Martinez. 

STATEMENT OF HON. MEL MARTINEZ, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator  MARTINEZ.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  very,  very  much. 
I’m  delighted  to  be  here  today  and  join  in  this  Commerce  Com-
mittee  hearing.  And  as  Senator  Nelson  said,  I’m  not  a  member  of 
the  Committee,  but  I’m  delighted  to  have  a  chance  to  participate 
at his invitation, and thank him for that, very, very much. 

The  fact  is  that  this  is  a  problem  which  touches  all  of  us  who 
love  Central  Florida,  who’ve  grown  up  here,  and  who  understand 
the fabric of this very, very wonderful space community. 

I  want  to  thank  the  elected  officials  who  are  here,  the  County 
Commissioners, other elected officials, and I appreciate their inter-
est,  as  well.  Also,  our  host—the  Port  Authority—I  want  to  thank 
you  for  the  great  job  that  you  do,  bringing  commerce  and  jobs  to 
this community. 

And let me thank the panel, and then the second panel, as well, 

for being a part of this important day, here. 

You  know,  NASA,  the  space  program  has  been  to  Central  Flor-
ida,  as  part  of  what  we  are,  as  part  of  the  fabric  of  this  area.  The 
fact  is  that,  the  jobs  that  are  spun  off—not  only  the  ones  that  are 
directly  related  to  NASA  activities,  but  those  that  relate  to  the 
other activities that are generated, because of what NASA has val-
ued as important to this and important to the State of Florida. And 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

4 

now  we’re  facing  a  situation  where  this  family,  this  tremendous 
team  of  people  that  have  come  together  to  put  us  into  space,  in 
good times and in bad, who have known how to bring this program 
from  the  brink,  on  a  couple  of  occasions  after  tragedy  has  struck, 
to put it back together, to put it back in flight, to keep it on sched-
ule, and to do the things that are so remarkable. 

I  was  so  pleased  to  see  the  Japanese  module  get  up  into  space. 
I  remember  seeing  it  here,  stored  and  waiting  for  its  turn,  and 
delays  and  problems  and  challenges.  This  workforce  has  met  them 
all.  This  is  the  best  and  the  brightest  and  the  most  accomplished 
group  of  people  you  could  have  anywhere  in  the  world,  and  it  is  a 
national treasure. 

And it’s a national treasure we cannot afford to lose. That we can 
not  afford  to  just  put  out  to  pasture  because  of  the  inconvenience 
of time. 

I’m concerned about two things. I’m concerned about the industry 
in  this  region,  that  employs  more  than  64,000  people  in  Florida. 
I’m  concerned  about  the  1,034  separate  contracts  we’ve  valued  at 
more than $875 million—all of the things that, together, make this 
the  economic  engine  that  it  is,  but  I’m  also  concerned  for  our  na-
tional security. 

I’m  concerned  about  the  United  States  losing  the  ability  to  put 
a  human  in  space,  and  depending  on  the  Russians  to  do  this  for 
us. 

Now,  you  know,  I  love  the  fact  that  we  get  along  with  the  Rus-
sians,  and  that  we  are  in  partnership  and  that  we’re  doing  things 
together.  And  this  Space  Station  is  called  the  International  Space 
Station. So, I’m not going to go on longer about what that implies, 
but  the  truth  of  the  matter  is  that  we  don’t  always  know  where 
Russia’s  leadership  is  on  any  given  day.  The  fact  of  the  matter  is 
that  we  might  cooperate  very  well  in  some  things,  and  then  from 
time  to  time  we  wonder  about  whether  our  goals  are  the  same 
around the world, or not. 

You know, they are not a democracy like we’re a democracy, they 
have  a  little  different  system  of  government.  And  the  fact  of  the 
matter  is  that  I  would  hope—and  I’m  counting  on  the  fact  that 
we’ll  have  the  kind  of  cooperation  we  need—we  need  to  be  careful 
how we say this, but at the same time, it does seem to me that for 
us to be the preeminent nation in space—which we have been, ever 
since  the  workforce  here  at  NASA  won  the  race  to  the  Moon—and 
that wasn’t won just by wishing it. It was won by hard work, it was 
won  by  teamwork,  it  was  won  by  skill,  but  it  was  also  won  by  a 
national  commitment  by  our  Congress  and  the  White  House—it 
takes  all  of  us  working  together  to  make  that  happen.  And  that  is 
what I envision for the future of the space program, it’s what I en-
vision  for  the  future  of  the  Space  Coast,  and  what  I’d  like  to  see 
occur. 

Not  only,  by  the  way,  with  governmental-oriented  programs,  but 
branching  out  into  this  vast  new  world  of  public/private  partner-
ships, of looking for ways that we can expand the horizons of space 
to,  not  only  the  governmental  projects,  but  also  to  the  private  sec-
tor,  so  that  we  can  see  the  fullness  of  space  exploration—just  like 
this port doesn’t just depend on the Navy presence to function—it’s 
a  part  of  it,  and  the  Coast  Guard  coming  out  of  here—the  fact  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

5 

the  matter  is  that  it’s  our  private  sector  that  has  made  this  port 
flourish, likewise, St. Petersburg, Florida is ending on the ultimate 
destination, as ultimate possibility when it becomes a port, not only 
for  space  launch  by  government,  but  equally  for  space  launch  by 
the private sector. 

We  are  falling  behind  as  other  nations  in  the  world  are  taking 
a  lead  in  the  private  exploration  of  space—we  have  got  to  play 
catch-up  on  that.  And  the  thing  we  don’t  need  to  do  is  to  lose  this 
tremendous  workforce,  to  put  people  out  of  work,  give  them  their 
pink  slip,  while  at  the  same  time,  we’re  generating  jobs  in  Russia 
to  accomplish  the  same  mission.  It’s  short-sighted,  it  makes  no 
sense,  we  need  to  reverse  it,  we’re  delighted  for  the  people  who 
came out today to show their support for the Space Coast, for their 
jobs, and we’re also pleased to welcome a panel—I really appreciate 
Dr.  Griffin  being  here,  and  the  other  members  of  the  panel  we’ll 
be hearing from. 

So, thank you very much for coming today. 
Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  very  much  for  calling  this  hearing.  It 
is  timely,  it  is  important,  and  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  be 
with you. 

Thank you. 
Senator  NELSON.  He  is  going  to  remain  for  the  second  panel,  to 
hear from the Brevard County Economic Development Commission 
of  Florida’s  Space  Coast,  and  the  Brevard  Workforce  Development 
Board.  What  we’re  trying  to  do,  is  to  figure  out  how  we  can  miti-
gate the job losses. 

Dr.  Griffin,  you  know  my  personal  appreciation  and  affection  for 
you.  We  have  the  Administrator  of  NASA,  we  have  his  Associate 
Administrator  for  Space  Operations,  Bill  Gerstenmaier,  and  we 
have  the  Deputy  Associate  Administrator  for  Exploration  System, 
Doug Cooke. 
Dr. Griffin? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MICHAEL D. GRIFFIN, ADMINISTRATOR, 

NATIONAL AERONAUTICS AND SPACE ADMINISTRATION; 

ACCOMPANIED BY WILLIAM H. GERSTENMAIER, 

ASSOCIATE ADMINISTRATOR, SPACE OPERATIONS MISSION 

DIRECTORATE, NASA; AND DOUG COOKE, ASSOCIATE 
ADMINISTRATOR, EXPLORATION SYSTEMS MISSION 

DIRECTORATE, NASA 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Thank  you,  Senator  Nelson,  Senator  Martinez.  It’s 
a pleasure to be here, and especially with my colleagues—if you’ve 
got Doug Cooke and Bill Gerstenmaier here, you’ve got the best we 
have at NASA. 

Thanks  for  inviting  us  to  discuss  the  greatest  challenge  we 
have—flying the Space Shuttle safely to complete the International 
Space Station, then retiring it in 2010 and bringing new Constella-
tion  systems  online,  while  remaining  within  our  budgetary  re-
sources. 

It  is  a  difficult  time.  It  is  important  to  remind  ourselves  why  it 

is also necessary. 

Admiral Gehman’s observation in the wake of the Columbia acci-
dent  holds  as  true  today  as  it  did  then,  quoting,  ‘‘because  of  the 
risk inherent in the original design of the Shuttle, because that de-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

6 

sign was based, in many aspects, on now obsolete technologies, and 
because  the  Shuttle  is  now  an  aging  system,  but  still  develop-
mental  in  character,  it  is  in  the  Nation’s  interest  to  replace  the 
Shuttle  as  soon  as  possible  as  the  primary  means  for  transporting 
humans to and from Earth orbit.’’ 

We  must  not  forget  the,  or  the  many  other  hard  lessons  of  that 
tragedy. We’ve made great progress in 5 years. With enormous dif-
ficulty,  we  returned  the  Shuttle  to  flight,  and  we’re  flying  well. 
We’re  successfully  assembling  the  Space  Station.  We  must  main-
tain  this  sense  of  tenacity  and  purpose  in  the  conduct  of  the  re-
maining  Shuttle  flights.  We  must  not  allow  our  resolute  sense  of 
purpose—so  fresh  after  the  accident—to  fade  with  time.  We  must 
avoid distractions. 

Now, above all else, we need clear communications. Many stories 
were published the spring following our initial workforce transition 
report  to  Congress.  Preliminary  estimates  of  6,400  job  losses  at 
KSC  were  reported  out  of  context,  without  the  qualifying  informa-
tion  that  we  offered  about  the  many  contracts  yet  to  be  awarded, 
or the funds budgeted for future work at KSC. 

As  I  offered  in  earlier  testimony,  I  continue  to  believe  that  we 
are facing an actual reduction of three to four thousand workers at 
KSC.  We’re  working  every  day  to  reduce  even  less,  but  there’s  no 
simple  solution  within  the  resources  provided.  There  is  no  silver 
bullet. 

Now most of those who work in the space business do so for rea-
sons beyond money, but still they have families to support. And to 
that  end,  we’ve  identified  retention  incentives  for  certain  critically 
skilled Space Shuttle operations personnel. 

We will issue a Request for Proposals early next year for ground 
operations  processing  in  KSC.  After  this  fall’s  Hubble  Servicing 
Mission,  we  will  begin  mods  to  Pad  39B  to  prepare  for  a  series  of 
Ares  I  flight  tests,  beginning  in  2009.  And  KSC  will  be  the  lead 
center for the disposition of Shuttle assets, after we retire that sys-
tem. 

Because  the  Orion  and  Ares–I  systems  are  much  simpler  and 
safer than the Space Shuttle, we will not need nearly as many peo-
ple  for  KSC  launch  operations.  Thus,  our  hope  is  that  many  engi-
neers  and  technicians  will  transition  to  the  assembly  and  integra-
tion of the Ares V heavy lifter, and the Altair Moon lander. 

We’re taking steps to work with Federal, State and local agencies 
on  necessary  retraining.  But  I  must  be  perfectly  clear—the  single 
pacing  item  for  maintaining  a  cohesive  workforce  while  bringing 
new  systems  online  is  the  funding  provided  by  the  Congress  each 
year, and the budget projected for the agency over the next several 
years. 

Our  plain  contract  awards  and  our  pace  of  work,  are  contingent 

upon programmatic and funding stability. 

So,  while  I  sincerely  thank  both  of  you  for  your  support  for 
NASA  over  the  years,  it  remains  true  that  the  actual  budget  re-
ceived for these systems has eroded significantly, compared to that 
which we were promised 5 years ago. 

Again,  Columbia  Accident  Investigation  Board  offers  a  crucial 
perspective, ‘‘This approach can only be successful if it is sustained 
over  the  decade,  if  by  the  time  the  decision  to  develop  a  new  vehi-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

7 

cle is made, there is a clear idea of how the new transportation sys-
tem  fits  into  the  Nation’s  overall  plans  for  space,  and  if  the  U.S. 
Government is willing at the time a deployment development deci-
sion  is  made,  to  commit  the  substantial  resources  required  to  im-
plement it.’’ 

Thus,  I  cannot  guarantee  that  the  Orion  crew  vehicle  will  be 
available sooner than 2015, although we will certainly try. Nor can 
we  afford  to  start  an  additional  procurement  for  commercial  crew 
transport  development  within  our  existing  exploration  systems 
budget. 

With  the  $500  million  allocated  already  to  the  COTS  program, 
our  first  priority  is  to  develop  an  affordable,  commercial  cargo  ca-
pability for our assets logistics. 

So,  the  United  States  will  continue  to  be  reliant  upon  the  Rus-
sian  Soyuz  system  for  ISS  crew  transport  and  crew  rescue,  some-
thing  I  find  to  be  unseemly  in  the  extreme.  However,  I  can’t  find 
a way to avoid it. 

While  I  do  not  relish  the  idea  of  Senator  Nelson  and  Senator 
Martinez—as  you’ve  said—of  American  taxpayers  paying  Russian 
engineers, I’m nonetheless glad that the Russians are our partners 
on  Space  Station,  because  without  them,  the  International  Space 
Station would be in jeopardy. 

We’ll  need  the  help  of  Congress—specifically,  the  Foreign  Rela-
tions  Committee—to  allow  NASA  to  continue  to  make  such  pur-
chases  from  Russia,  after  2011.  We  need  that  help  this  fall,  in 
order  to  have  adequate  time  to  negotiate  contracts  for  production. 
Finally,  Chairman  Nelson,  Senator  Martinez,  I  thank  you  for 
your leadership and support for NASA. Our budget—less than six- 
tenths of a percent of the Federal budget, about 15 cents a day for 
the  average  person—leverages  a  much  broader  range  of  American 
leadership  around  the  world  than  its  mere  size  would  lead  many 
to  believe.  To  preserve  that  leadership,  we  must  stay  the  course, 
we must remain focused upon the challenges ahead. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Griffin follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. MICHAEL D. GRIFFIN, ADMINISTRATOR, 

NATIONAL AERONAUTICS AND SPACE ADMINISTRATION 

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity 
to  appear  today  to  discuss  the  transition  of  NASA’s  workforce  at  Kennedy  Space 
Center  (KSC)  as  the  Space  Shuttle  Program  approaches  retirement  at  the  end  of 
FY  2010  and  NASA  embarks  on  returning  Americans  to  the  Moon  and  opening  up 
the  way  to  other  destinations  in  our  solar  system  with  the  new  Constellation  Pro-
gram.  The  transition  from  Space  Shuttle  to  Constellation  over  the  next  few  years 
provides  a  rare  opportunity  to  reinvent  NASA  and  reinvigorate  the  Nation’s  space 
exploration capabilities. NASA is executing the first major change in United States 
civil  space  policy  in  35  years  with  bipartisan  Congressional  support  of  the  NASA 
Authorization Act of 2005 (Pub. L. 109–155). I believe that this Act remains the fin-
est policy framework for United States civil space activities that I have seen in forty 
years, and I thank this Subcommittee for its leadership role in crafting this legisla-
tion. 

NASA’s  budget  is  sufficient  to  support  a  broad  variety  of  excellent  space  pro-
grams,  but  it  cannot  support  all  of  the  potential  programs  all  of  our  stakeholders 
would wish for us to execute. Balanced choices must be made, but they cannot con-
tinually  be  remade  and  revisited  if  there  is  to  be  steady  progress  toward  our  com-
mon,  defined  objectives.  As  the  Columbia  Accident  Investigation  Board  noted,  and 
as  stakeholders  acknowledged  in  ensuing  policy  debates,  it  would  have  been  far 
worse  to  continue  with  the  prior  lack  of  strategic  direction  for  human  spaceflight, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

8 

to continue dithering and debating and inevitably widening the gap between Shuttle 
retirement and the availability of new systems. 

There  have  been  suggestions  that  NASA  extend  Space  Shuttle  operations  beyond 
FY 2010, but this would have serious budgetary and schedule repercussions for the 
Constellation program. The cost of continuing to support Shuttle operations beyond 
2010  would  be  about  $2.7  to  $4.0B  per  year.  The  substantial  funding  for  such  an 
approach would come out of the Constellation Program, disrupting its schedule and 
delaying the initial operational capability of the Orion Crew Exploration Vehicle. In 
addition,  the  Constellation  architecture  is  designed  to  take  advantage  of  Space 
Shuttle  infrastructure,  production  capabilities,  and  workforce  once  they  are  no 
longer needed for flying the Shuttle. If the Shuttle were kept flying past its planned 
retirement date, these capabilities could not be released for Constellation’s modifica-
tion  and  use.  It  will  also  be  extremely  difficult  to  keep  the  Shuttle  workforce  en-
gaged  if  Shuttle  fly-out  is  extended.  Ending  Shuttle  operations  on  a  planned  date 
known  well  in  advance  is  much  easier  for  the  workforce  and  planning  than  having 
a  floating  end  date.  Keeping  the  Shuttle  system  operational  past  September  30, 
2010,  would  only  compound  the  problem  of  getting  Constellation  into  service,  exac-
erbate  the  gap  in  NASA  human  space  launch  capabilities,  and  delay  America’s  re-
turn to the Moon. Not moving forward or delaying exploration capabilities would be 
more deleterious to the KSC workforce than the current plans. The KSC community 
will benefit directly from the lunar activities. 

NASA’s  focus  is  on  safely  flying  the  Space  Shuttle  to  complete  assembly  of  the 
International  Space  Station  (ISS)  and  honor  our  commitments  to  our  international 
partners prior to retiring the Shuttle in 2010, while bringing the new Constellation 
systems  online  by  2015  or  sooner.  Through  this  period,  NASA’s  greatest  asset  will 
continue  to  be  its  people—the  thousands  of  individuals  across  the  country  in  both 
government and industry who conceive, design, build, operate, and manage an ambi-
tious  program  of  space  exploration  on  behalf  of  the  Nation.  Our  greatest  challenge 
over  the  next  several  years  will  be  managing  this  extremely  talented,  experienced, 
and  geographically  dispersed  workforce  as  we  transition  from  operating  the  Space 
Shuttle  to  utilizing  the  ISS  as  a  National  Laboratory,  and  expanding  our  reach  to 
the Moon, Mars, and beyond. We must work as carefully as possible to preserve the 
engineering and technical skills we need to carry out these efforts and minimize im-
pacts  to  our  workforce,  both  at  KSC  and  at  other  Agency  and  contractor  facilities 
across  the  Nation.  These  are  our  people.  We  need  them  to  carry  out  our  mission, 
and we care for their well being. 
Transition Challenge and Response 

NASA remains committed to the concept of ‘‘ten healthy Centers,’’ and still plans 
to spend generally the same amount on human spaceflight labor nationwide, but our 
workforce  will  need  to  transition  from  primarily  operations  to  development  work. 
NASA  does  not  yet  have  all  the  answers  for  carrying  out  this  complex  transition 
safely  and  effectively;  however,  we  have  been  actively  dealing  with  these  issues  for 
the  past  several  years  and  working  on  them  each  and  every  day.  Our  best  tool  to 
retain employees is to provide meaningful and challenging work. We are doing this 
now  through  the  challenging  and  exciting  ISS  assembly  missions.  Looking  toward 
the  future,  we  are  working  hard  to  give  people  an  opportunity  to  transition  the 
skills  learned  flying  the  Shuttle  to  the  design  and  operation  of  the  next  generation 
of  vehicles,  through  work  sharing,  retraining,  job  rotations,  and  other  mechanisms. 
Today,  a  large  portion  of  the  Agency’s  skilled  civil  servant  and  contractor  work-
force is focused on the safety of ongoing mission operations. Much of the experience 
and expertise within this workforce is required for the Constellation program to suc-
ceed. However, the effects of the transition will not be the same for everyone. While 
approximately 80 percent or more of NASA’s budget will continue to pay for the pur-
chase of contractor products, goods, and services, the nature of the work being done 
will  change.  NASA’s  human  spaceflight  workforce  will  shift  from  a  focus  primarily 
on operating spacecraft to a new recurring cycle of spacecraft development and oper-
ations.  NASA  recognizes  and  values  the  dedication  of  its  Space  Shuttle  workforce 
and  will  leverage  this  resource,  where  feasible,  by  engaging  those  men  and  women 
in  the  challenging  future  work  that  capitalizes  on  their  unique  skills  and  abilities 
to the maximum extent practical. 

We  will  keep  the  Congress  informed  as  we  know  more,  award  more  contracts,  or 
assign  new  roles  and  responsibilities  to  the  NASA  Centers  most  affected  by  the  re-
tirement  of  the  Space  Shuttle,  such  as  KSC  and  the  Michoud  Assembly  Facility 
(MAF) in Louisiana. The entire NASA management team takes the displacement of 
lives and skills very seriously as we wind down the Shuttle program. We will ensure 
that critical skills are retained to carry out the exciting missions before us. We are 
already  ensuring  that  the  lessons  learned  by  the  people  operating  NASA’s  complex 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

9 

systems will be captured by allowing these people to work on the new Constellation 
systems.  As  one  example  of  this  commitment,  the  personnel  supporting  Shuttle 
launch will help to launch the first test flight of Ares (Ares I–X), scheduled for next 
year. 
NASA Opportunities at KSC 

KSC  has  always  played  a  vital  role  in  human  and  robotic  space  exploration,  and 
will  continue  to  do  so,  for  both  NASA  and  the  emerging  commercial  space  sector. 
With  the  planned  retirement  of  the  Space  Shuttle  following  flyout  of  the  current 
flight manifest by September 30, 2010, and planned initial operational capability of 
the new Ares I Crew Launch and Orion Crew Exploration Vehicles in the Constella-
tion  Program  in  2015,  this  four-and-a-half-year  gap  in  NASA  human  space  launch 
capability will be anything but quiet at KSC. During this period, the flurry of activ-
ity  at  KSC  will  include:  lunar  requirements  development;  facilities,  operations,  and 
vehicle  planning;  new  construction  and  extensive  modifications  to  existing  infra-
structure;  robust  systems  testing  and  evaluation;  operations  and  launch  procedures 
and  checklist  development;  extensive  training;  large  scale  systems  processing  and 
integration;  and,  vigorous  production—all  of  which  will  engage  our  skilled  work-
force. In addition, important transition and retirement work associated with Shuttle 
equipment and facilities will contribute to the continuity of employment between fly- 
out of the Shuttle and the initial flight of Orion. 

It is important to recognize that in the near-term future, there will be fewer jobs 
at KSC. One example of how we have mitigated this is with Orion assembly at the 
Operations and Checkout building at the Center. In addition, we have assigned sig-
nificant lunar roles to the Center, though the benefits of this will not be felt in the 
immediate future. The near-term mix of tasks that NASA is planning to execute will 
involve  more  work  going  to  design  contractors  located  around  the  Nation,  and  less 
work going to operations contractors at KSC. We are working with state and county 
officials to help bring in non-NASA work. 
Enabling Workforce Transition Through Retraining and Incentives 

Many  members  of  the  KSC  aerospace  workforce  will  need  to  transition  from 
launch operations and Shuttle Orbiter ground processing to development, assembly, 
integration  and  test  activities  for  our  Constellation  systems.  Over  the  past  year, 
NASA  has  made  a  concerted  effort  to  share  workforce  among  multiple  programs, 
particularly  Shuttle,  ISS,  and  Constellation,  enabling  people  to  build  crossover 
skills.  The  effort,  known  as  Workforce  Synergy,  enables  the  Constellation  Program 
to progress while ensuring that the critical skills necessary to safely and efficiently 
execute  the  remaining  Space  Shuttle  missions  (complete  assembly  of  the  ISS  and 
service  the  Hubble  Space  Telescope).  On  the  civil  service  side,  NASA  is  tracking 
workforce  time  on  Space  Shuttle,  ISS,  and  Constellation,  and  the  analysis  has  re-
vealed  that  more  than  half  of  our  human  spaceflight  civil  servants  are  working  on 
more  than  one  program.  This  encourages  the  transfer  of  lessons  learned,  the  incor-
poration  of  operations  needs  into  design,  and  demonstrates  to  the  workforce  that 
they will have future work on the Constellation Program as Shuttle is retired. 

NASA  is  providing  the  tools,  training,  and  time  for  workers  to  gain  experience 
and skills on new processes we know we will implement for Orion and Ares. NASA 
is  applying  these  new  processes  required  for  Constellation  into  Shuttle  processing 
now, to provide skill and experience that the workforce will need to do future work 
on Constellation. This will be real, hands-on experience that will qualify workers for 
future work. Examples include: 

• The United Space Alliance (USA) Shuttle Program Operations Contract (SPOC) 
workforce is being used by Constellation to process the Ares I–X vehicle for the 
first  Constellation  test  flight,  scheduled  for  spring–summer  2009.  The  Ares  I– 
X  flight  will  be  conducted  with  the  help  of  many  contractor  personnel  from  the 
Space Shuttle workforce. 
• For STS–120, a single Solid Rocket Booster was stacked one segment at a time 
to  gather  engineering  information  on  the  Mobile  Launch  Platform  for  Ares  I– 
X. 
• On  STS–118,  the  Shuttle  Endeavor  was  powered  up  during  operations  and 
check-out using a new ‘‘paperless’’ process as a test of future procedures for the 
Orion. 

As  part  of  its  efforts  to  cooperatively  work  transition  issues  with  state  and  local 
officials,  on  May  27,  2008,  NASA  signed  a  non-reimbursable  Space  Act  Agreement 
with  the  Brevard  Workforce  Development  Board  (BWDB)  with  the  objective  of  pre-
paring  Brevard  County’s  highly  skilled  contractor  workforce  for  the  transition  from 
Shuttle  to  the  Constellation  Program.  These  efforts  will  enhance  the  BWDB’s  mis-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

10 

sion  to  retain,  strengthen,  and  expand  the  county’s  aerospace  contractor  workforce. 
Under  the  terms  of  the  agreement,  NASA  will  participate  in  initiatives  of  the 
Board’s Aerospace Career Development Committee, meet with the Board to provide 
workforce  data,  provide  a  representative  to  serve  as  an  ex-officio  member  of  the 
BWDB  Board  of  Directors,  and  collaborate  in  the  development  of  space  workforce 
training and assistance initiatives. The BWDB will work in support of existing and 
future  KSC  missions  through  cooperation  in  requirements  planning  and  implemen-
tation  of  training  and  other  initiatives  to  assist  in  the  development  of  needed  new 
skills and capabilities, and meet with KSC senior leaders periodically to educate and 
inform them on their program of work. 

NASA  is  also  working  with  contractors  to  enable  them  to  implement  incentive 
programs  to  retain  skilled  employees  as  the  Agency  approaches  transition.  Exam-
ples include: 

• NASA  is  advised  that  United  Space  Alliance  (USA)  has  established  two  pro-
grams  for  employees  impacted  by  Shuttle  transition.  The  Enhanced  Severance 
Pay  program  will  provide  USA  employees  who  are  laid  off  a  minimum  of  4 
weeks’ pay and maximum of 26 weeks’ pay, depending on years of service, sub-
ject  to  policy  criteria.  The  Shuttle  Program  Operations  Contract  (SPOC)  Com-
pletion Bonus, which is additive to Enhanced Severance Pay, will provide SPOC 
employees  with  critical/essential  skills  who  are  laid  off  with  a  minimum  of  15 
weeks’ pay and maximum of 26 weeks’ pay, depending on years of service. More 
than  6,000  USA  employees  (∼4,000  of  whom  are  at  KSC)  meet  the  ‘‘critical/es-
sential skill’’ criteria. 
• On  April  30,  2008,  NASA  announced  a  modification  of  the  Lockheed  Martin 
Space  Systems  External  Tank  contract  which  will  provide  incentives  to  eligible 
contractor  personnel  to  ensure  mission  success  and  construction  of  the  remain-
ing  External  Tanks  to  support  the  Space  Shuttle  through  its  retirement.  The 
contract modification is valued at $39.5M. 
• On  June  10,  2008,  NASA  announced  a  modification  of  the  Pratt  &  Whitney 
Rocketdyne  (PWR)  Space  Shuttle  Main  Engine  (SSME)  contract  to  incorporate 
an  employee  retention  incentive  plan  to  ensure  that  critical  skills  are  retained 
to  enable  the  safe  fly-out  of  the  Space  Shuttle  fleet.  The  modification  is  valued 
at $16.8M. 

KSC Future Role in Human Spaceflight 

KSC is already taking a leading role in many areas of the Agency’s future human 

spaceflight program, including: 

• Supporting Exploration experiments on the ISS. 
• Constellation program integration and support for safety, reliability and quality 
assurance (SR&QA); systems engineering and integration; and test and evalua-
tion.  This  effort  supports  integrated  hazards  analysis  and  preliminary  hazard 
analysis;  Risk  Management,  and  quality  assurance  for  the  Constellation  Pro-
gram. 
• KSC  ground  operations  activities  include  project  management  and  integration; 
responsibility for achieving all Agency ground operations objectives allocated to 
the launch and landing sites; leading design, development, test and engineering, 
and  logistics  activities  for  all  ground  processing,  launch  and  recovery  systems; 
and serving as lead for ground processing, launch and landing operations plan-
ning  and  execution.  On  June  6,  2008,  NASA  selected  contractors  for  a  fabrica-
tion  of  ground  support  equipment  for  Constellation  and  other  space  programs 
at KSC. The multiple award indefinite-delivery indefinite-quantity contract has 
a maximum value of $400 million during a basic five-year ordering period with 
the potential to be extended for as much as 1 year past the end of the ordering 
period.  Several  Florida  companies,  including  Engravers  Metal  Fabricators  of 
Cocoa;  TJ  Inc.  of  Christmas;  Precision  Fabricating  &  Cleaning  Co.,  Inc.  of 
Cocoa;  Coastal  Steel,  Inc.  of  Cocoa;  Met-Con,  Inc.  of  Cocoa;  Samson  Metal  & 
Machine of Lakeland; and Specialty Maintenance and Construction of Lakeland, 
were awarded contracts as part of this award, along with companies from other 
states. 
• KSC will provide contractor oversight for the Orion ground processing effort, in-
cluding ground support equipment, and will lead the launch operations and re-
covery support during design, development, test and engineering; as well as per-
form prime contractor oversight and independent analysis. 
• KSC will support work that will be done under a contract awarded on June 12, 
2008  for  the  design,  development,  and  production  of  a  new  space  suit  system 
for Constellation astronauts. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

11 

• For the Ares I, KSC will lead ground processing, launch operations and recovery 
support  during  design,  development,  test  and  engineering;  as  well  as  lead 
launch  operations  planning  and  execution  for  Ares  I–X  and  other  flight  dem-
onstrations. 
• In  support  of  the  2009  Ares  I–X  test  flight,  as  well  as  other  flight  demonstra-
tions, NASA started the construction of facilities modifications to KSC in 2007. 
KSC  is  modifying  equipment  and  facilities  used  most  recently  by  the  Space 
Shuttle,  such  as  Launch  Control  Center  Firing  Room  One,  and  Launch  Pad 
39B, to prepare for Constellation testing. 
• Other  construction  of  facilities  (CoF)  projects  to  be  carried  out  as  part  of  the 
Agency’s  transition  activities  include  modifications  to  the  Operations  and 
Checkout  building,  the  Vehicle  Assembly  Building  (VAB),  and  the  Multi-Pay-
load  Processing  Facility  (MPPF).  Constellation’s  facility  requirements  continue 
to  evolve  in  parallel  with  flight  hardware  maturity.  As  project  offices  are  cre-
ated  and  move  into  manufacturing  and  processing,  facilities  requirements  are 
being identified, evaluated, and requested. The contractor workforce that will be 
associated  with  construction  of  facilities  projects  has  not  been  included  in  the 
‘‘Workforce Transition Strategy—Initial Report.’’ At this time, NASA cannot es-
timate  the  number  of  contractor  personnel  to  be  associated  with  the  various 
CoF projects, in part because Agency bases its contract awards on open competi-
tions that do not stipulate workforce numbers. In addition, the full scope of CoF 
activities in support of Constellation is not yet known. 

Further  into  the  future,  KSC  will  support  lunar  architecture  work  for  the  Con-
stellation  Program  system  engineering;  ground  operations,  and  assembly  for  Orion 
and Ares I Low Earth Orbit operations phase; Ares V ground processing, launch op-
erations  and  recovery  support  during  design,  development,  test  and  engineering; 
final assembly of and ground processing support for human lunar lander; and lunar 
surface  habitat  management  and  integration.  Additionally,  KSC  will  be  the  NASA 
lead  for  lunar  surface  in  situ  resource  utilization  systems  and  support  surface  sys-
tems logistics concepts, all of which are vital to our Exploration success. 

Therefore,  given  the  exciting  and  varied  amount  of  work  that  is  in  KSC’s  future, 
it  is  clear  that  NASA  is  not  going  out  of  business  at  KSC;  rather,  this  transition 
will enable a new line of NASA business at KSC as the Center increases its involve-
ment with Exploration activities that will be pursued for decades to come. 
Launch Services Program 

As  we  prepare  for  the  future  of  human  spaceflight,  it  is  important  to  remember 
that  KSC  has  also  been  key  to  launching  NASA’s  robotic  explorations  of  the  Earth 
and  space,  and  this  will  continue  through  the  transition  from  Shuttle  to  Orion  and 
beyond.  The  Agency’s  Launch  Services  Program  (LSP)  has  maintained  a  success 
rate  of  98.8  percent  since  1987.  LSP  supports  NASA  science  missions,  as  well  as 
the  launch  of  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  spacecraft  (e.g., 
Geosynchronous  Operational  Environmental  Satellites),  Department  of  Defense 
spacecraft (e.g., Global Positioning System and Defense Support Program), and com-
mercial satellites (e.g., GeoEye 1). 
Commercial Space Activity at KSC 

In  addition  to  playing  a  key  role  in  the  Constellation  Program,  KSC  will  support 
commercial  space  activity.  NASA  is  actively  encouraging  the  growth  of  a  new,  ro-
bust, commercially-based space economy through the Commercial Orbital Transpor-
tation Services (COTS) project. From the beginning, NASA has considered COTS to 
be an investment in space commercialization, and with that investment, there were 
inherent risks associated with stimulating a market capability that is in its infancy. 
Therefore, NASA is providing $500 million as ‘‘seed money’’ to spur the commercial 
space  industry  to  develop  and  demonstrate  commercial  orbital  transportation  serv-
ices. It is also important to understand that NASA is only one investor in the over-
all  demonstration  of  commercial  cargo  services.  The  commercial  space  companies 
(and  their  other  private  investors)  are  the  largest  investors  because  they  stand  to 
reap  the  financial  benefits  of  developing  a  proven  commercial  space  transportation 
capability that they can sell to other non-NASA customers. 

Both  of  the  funded  COTS  Phase  I  partners,  SpaceX  and  Orbital  Sciences  Corp., 
plan  to  demonstrate  cargo  mission  capabilities  to  the  ISS  in  calendar  year  2010. 
NASA has identified ISS commercial cargo requirements in the 2010–11 timeframe, 
and the Agency is in the process of procuring commercial cargo services through the 
ISS Commercial Resupply Services acquisition. The Request For Proposals (RFP) for 
these  services  was  released  on  April  14,  2008,  with  an  award  expected  by  the  end 
of 2008. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

12 

By investing in U.S. private industry through COTS, NASA is facilitating develop-
ment of reliable, cost-effective access to low Earth orbit (LEO). The intent is to cre-
ate  a  market  environment  in  which  commercial  space  transportation  services  are 
available to Government and private sector customers. The availability of safe, reli-
able  and  economical  service  to  LEO  will  help  NASA  achieve  the  Nation’s  goals  of 
retiring the Space Shuttle and building a new space transportation system. 

In addition to COTS, the possibility of leasing land to one or more commercial en-
tities  to  develop  and  operate  a  Commercial  Vertical  Launch  Complex  (CVLC)  on 
KSC property is being considered. 
Enhanced Use Leasing (EUL) 

NASA’s  use  of  Enhanced  Use  Leasing  (EUL)  improves  the  Agency’s  performance 
by allowing it to recover asset values, reduce operating costs, improve facility condi-
tions, and improve mission effectiveness. It also opens up opportunities for commer-
cial  vendors  who  can  make  effective  use  of  NASA  facilities  and  equipment  at  the 
Agency’s Centers, including KSC. NASA encourages the use of its facilities by other 
agencies, industries, and universities (e.g., Space Shuttle Landing Facility). NASA’s 
Centers  have  begun  to  develop  enhanced  use  leases  for  their  underutilized  real 
property,  and  KSC  and  Ames  Research  Center  (ARC)  have  participated  in  an  EUL 
demonstration  program  that  will  likely  continue  to  result  in  lease  awards  in  FY 
2009. NASA will continue to provide a fiscal year report to Congress on the progress 
of its use of enhanced use lease authority. 
Iran, North Korea and Syria Nonproliferation Act (INKSNA) Relief 

In order to minimize impacts to NASA’s workforce, it is essential that the Agency 
transition  from  the  Space  Shuttle  to  Constellation  as  quickly  and  as  smoothly  as 
possible.  One  key  element  of  this  effort  is  the  extension  of  relief  from  the  Iran, 
North Korea and Syria Nonproliferation Act (INKSNA) to enable the Agency to pur-
chase  Russian  services  beyond  2011.  On  April  11,  2008,  the  Administration  sub-
mitted  a  proposed  amendment  to  Congress  to  extend  the  exception  for  payments  to 
Russia  for  Soyuz  crew  transportation  and  rescue  services  until  the  Orion  Crew  Ex-
ploration Vehicle reaches Full Operational Capability or a U.S. commercial provider 
of  crew  transportation  and  rescue  services  demonstrates  the  capability  to  meet  ISS 
mission requirements. In addition, the amendment would enable NASA to purchase 
Russian-unique  equipment  and  capabilities,  such  as  sustaining  engineering  and 
spares,  through  the  operational  life  on  the  ISS.  This  is  essential  to  maintain  an 
American  presence  onboard  to  sustain  and  utilize  the  ISS.  Continued  operation  of 
the  Station  is  also  important  for  the  developing  cargo  resupply  commercial  market. 
We look forward to working with the Congress on enactment of this crucial legisla-
tion. 
Conclusion 

NASA  continues  to  make  steady  progress  in  managing  its  challenges,  including 
the critical challenge of transitioning our Shuttle workforce to exciting new projects. 
The  Agency  has  assigned  leadership  roles  and  responsibilities  for  exploration  and 
science missions to NASA’s ten field Centers across the country in order to help re-
store  the  core  technical  capabilities  across  the  Agency  as  we  transition  from  the 
Space  Shuttle  to  new  capabilities.  Thanks  to  its  dedicated,  highly  skilled  aerospace 
workforce, Kennedy Space Center will continue to play a key role in launching both 
human  and  robotic  space  missions,  as  it  has  since  it  was  established  in  July  1962 
as the Launch Operations Center. 

In  a  short  span  of  years,  we  have  already  taken  long  strides  in  the  formulation 
of  strategies  and  programs  that  will  take  us  back  to  the  Moon  and  on  to  Mars  and 
other  destinations  in  our  solar  system.  These  efforts  will  result  in  tremendous  op-
portunities for those interested in becoming involved in space exploration and devel-
opment at KSC, in both the Federal and commercial space sectors. 

Chairman Nelson, with your support and that of this Subcommittee, we are mak-
ing the right strategic choices for our Nation’s space program. Again, thank you for 
the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today.  I  would  be  pleased  to  respond  to  any 
questions that you may have. 

Senator NELSON. Dr. Griffin, I think I heard something new. You 
spoke of a cut of three to four thousand jobs. Instead of the projec-
tion,  on  the  upside,  that  we’ve  heard,  of  6,400  jobs.  You  want  to 
clarify? 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Yes, sir. You and I have, of course, talked privately 
about  that  in  your  offices,  and  we  have  talked  publicly  about  that. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

13 

We—the  projected  cuts  of  6,400  people  that  we’re  showing  in  that 
initial  Workforce  Transition  Report,  did  not—and  could  not  at  the 
time—also include the work which we expect to come to KSC in the 
future  as  we  develop  Ares  and  Orion  and  move  on  to  our  lunar— 
to our lunar systems. 

So, we think, at this point, that the net reduction would be some-
where in the three to four thousand, rather than in the six to seven 
thousand range. 

Senator NELSON. Even during the time-frame of 2011? 
Dr.  GRIFFIN.  We  do  not  think  the  6,400  that  was  offered  in  that 
report  represents  the  complete  picture.  We’re  putting  this  picture 
together,  as  we  go.  You  will  receive,  by  law,  a  new  report  every  6 
months,  and  as  increasing  maturity  of  the  newly  developed  pro-
grams  becomes  available,  we  will  refine  those  estimates.  But  our 
best guess for a long time has been three to four thousand, not six 
to seven thousand, even in 2011. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  this  is  the  first  time  that  that  has  been 
stated  publicly.  In  your  previous  testimony  before  our  committee 
you  had  said  6,400.  So,  now  putting  it  at  three  to  four  thousand, 
instead  of  the  6,400,  even  in  year  2011.  In  the  chart  of  the  con-
tractor workforce that was shown the high end was a 6,400 cut, low 
end was showing a cut of about 5,300, in 2011. Now we’re hearing 
a cut of considerably less. Of three to four thousand. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Yes, sir. 
Senator  NELSON.  That  is  some  news.  I  can’t  say  it’s  good  news, 

but it’s certainly news that’s a step in the right direction. 

Now,  to  put  this  in  perspective,  the  overall  employment  at  the 
Kennedy Space Center is about 14,500. The projections that you all 
put  out  in  your  cuts  were  from  just  the  Shuttle  workforce,  which 
started  at  8,000,  not  at  14,500.  So,  is  it  reasonable  to  think  that 
the workforce over and above the Shuttle workforce at the Kennedy 
Space Center will be fairly much intact, or do we not know? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  I  think  that  that  workforce  will  remain  fairly  well 
intact. There certainly can be collateral effects of retiring the Shut-
tle  that  may  influence  that  workforce,  but  I  would,  again,  offer  to 
this committee that we are, after all, retiring the Shuttle. So, even-
tually there will be no Shuttle jobs. 

What we are not yet able to show is the number of new jobs that 
will  be  developed  in  the  course  of  awarding  bids  for  Ares  I,  Ares 
V,  Altair  Lunar  Lander,  KSC  ground  operations  to  prepare  the  fa-
cilities and the pads for those vehicles, ISS experiment support, as 
we begin to use the ISS, and many other things that we do intend 
to  do  here  at  KSC  that  are  budgeted,  but  for  which  contracts  are 
not yet awarded, and therefore no preliminary manpower count can 
be allocated. 

So, you’re seeing reductions in Shuttle, but you’re not seeing, yet, 
and we’ll give it to you when we have it, but you’re not seeing, yet, 
the increases that will result from new programs. 

Senator NELSON. And, part of that is the fact that you will basi-

cally assemble the Orion spacecraft here in the ONC building? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  That’s  affirmative.  The  contractor—the  winning 
contractor  on  Orion  is  now  working  with  us  to  modify  the  ONC 
building at the Cape for Orion assembly. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

14 

Senator  NELSON.  So,  to  put  it  in  its  context,  I  want  to  do  this, 
because I think this is, although we can’t say good news when you 
talk  about  cuts,  it  is  clearly  a  step  in  the  right  direction  of  miti-
gating  these  cuts,  a  total  of  14,500  approximately  that  are  em-
ployed  at  the  Space  Center.  About  2011,  before  we  start  ramping 
back  up  in  2012,  you’re  looking  at  a  net  of  three  to  four  thousand 
cuts from that total workforce of 14,500. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. That’s what we think today, sir, and as I said in my 
opening statement, we are working to mitigate that number. We do 
not  take  the  loss  of  our  skilled  workforce  lightly,  and  have  been 
working every day to find ways to ameliorate that issue. 

Senator  NELSON.  Before  I  turn  to  Senator  Martinez,  I  just  want 
to  say  that  you  know  how  I  have  expressed  to  you,  and  all  of  you, 
in rather vigorous terms, that your own goals for NASA include 10 
healthy  Space  Centers.  Needless  to  say,  when  one  of  those  Space 
Centers gets absolutely whacked, where its heart is cut out, it’s not 
a  healthy  Space  Center,  it’s  a  Space  Center  that’s  on  life  support. 
So the fact that that you have given us this news today, I think, 
is significant. But, in terms of specifics, of nailing down the net job 
loss,  it’s  really  going  to  be  when  you  report  to  us  much  later  this 
year.  Is  that  going  to  be  the  time  when  we  will  have  a  better  fix 
on the specific number of job loss? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  We  probably  won’t  have  a  significant  reporting 
change  in,  for  the  October  report—that  would  be  6  months  after 
the  one  we  gave  you  from  April,  and  they’re  due  every  6  months, 
as I know you’re aware, but I wanted to get on the record. Because 
some of the significant contracts will still not have been let at that 
point. 

So, we have a considerable amount of forward work yet to do be-
fore  we  would  have  put  out  RFPs,  selected  contractors,  and  then 
been able—from, with that behind us—to give any sort of an imme-
diate, an ameliorative estimate. 

So, you won’t have something significantly different this October. 
Senator NELSON. I just want to say that I have had innumerable 
private  conversations  with  Dr.  Griffin.  And  he  is  doing  everything 
humanly possible, within the confines that he has to operate in, to 
mitigate these losses, and to be creative in an approach for the fu-
ture  workforce  here  at  Kennedy  Space  Center,  which  we  will  get 
into the specifics of later on. 

I thank you for that, Dr. Griffin. 
Senator Martinez? 
Senator MARTINEZ. Well, I’m looking forward to hearing from the 
other members of the panel, as well, but just to follow up, Dr. Grif-
fin,  as  you  go  forward  and  make  these  additional  contracts  that 
will then give a clearer picture of the workforce left—what, if any-
thing,  can  we  from  Congress  do  to  help  alleviate  the  problem?  To 
minimize the job loss? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Within  the  context  of—I  think  Senator  Nelson  has 
his  finger  on  the  core  of  the  issue,  and  so  I’ll  restate  it  again,  for 
emphasis.  But,  it  is—it  is  in  the  nature  of  what  it  is  we  do  here 
at  KSC.  We  integrate  and  launch  space  vehicles  here—it’s  NASA’s 
primary  center  for  doing  that.  And  I’ve  worked  down  here  on  and 
off  for  30  years  now,  in  one  role  or  another.  This,  in  some  ways, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

15 

is  the  least  satisfying  of  those  roles,  I  liked  it  a  lot  better  when  I 
was in closer touch with the hardware. 

But  what  we  do  here  is  we  integrate  and  launch  space  vehicles. 
The retirement of the Shuttle, and the development of new systems 
that  will  enable  us  to  return  to  the  Moon,  and  also  service  the 
International  Space  Station  as  the  Shuttle  does,  are  necessary 
things.  The  Shuttle  retirement,  and  the  development  of  new  sys-
tems is necessary for this Nation. 

The only thing which could have prevented this downturn in op-
erations  period  that  some  have  called  ‘‘the  gap,’’  would  have  been 
for  the  Congress  of  the  United  States,  and  for  the  Administration 
to  request,  and  for  the  Congress  to  approve,  a  significantly  higher 
NASA  budget,  so  that  we  would  operate  while  we  were  also  doing 
development. 

We  didn’t  do  that.  The  Administration  has  proposed  for  the  last 
5 years, and the Congress has approved, for the last 5 years, essen-
tially,  in  constant  dollars,  a  flat  NASA  budget.  Within  the  context 
of  that  budget,  we  are  doing  everything  humanly  possible  to  mini-
mize this gap. 

We have a forward plan to sustain the Space Station, admittedly, 
through  the  services  of  our  Russian  partners.  But  it  will  at  least 
protect our $100 billion investment in the Station. 

But  within  the  context  of  the  monies  that  we  have  available,  I 
believe  we  have  the  best  plan  that  we  can  have,  and  we  have  the 
plan which causes the least disruption possible, here at KSC. 

I  wish  that  it  were  less.  I’ve  said  this  on  the  record  for  the  3 
years  and  2  months  that  I’ve  had  this  job.  I  wish  that  there  were 
something  else  that  we  could  do  about  it.  But,  within  the  context 
of the resources available, we’re doing the best we can. 

Senator  MARTINEZ.  So,  the  job  losses  that  we’re  going  to  antici-
pate are reasonably forecasted—they’re very reasonably forecasted, 
given  a  5  year  legacy  of  flat  budgets  for  NASA  by  the  Administra-
tion and the Congress? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Yes,  sir.  We  have  projected—for  several  years  now, 
we  have  known,  and  we  have  been  very  clear—that  there  will  be 
a gap between Shuttle flights, and Ares/Orion, which will be the re-
placement vehicles. 

Senator  MARTINEZ.  So,  you  basically  have  been  fulfilling  your 
mission,  given  what  the  Congress  has  given  you,  and  what  the 
White House has given you? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  That  is  correct,  sir.  So,  we  have  known  of  this  gap, 

we are trying to plan our way through it, it is no secret. 

Now,  it  is  regrettable,  the  fact  that  it  is  not  a  secret  does  not 
mean I don’t regret it—I hugely regret it. But, we’ve done the best 
we can to plan our way through this very difficult time. 

Senator MARTINEZ. Thank you, I have no other questions. 
Senator  NELSON.  And  I  want  to  point  out  that  Dr.  Griffin  oper-
ates  within  constraints.  He’s  given  a  budget  that  he  has  to  live 
within, and so his public stance has to be in support of that budget. 
Now,  let  me  just  illustrate  how  difficult  this  is.  When  we 
launched  Challenger  over  two  decades  ago,  there  was  a  return-to- 
flight cost to bring back the Shuttle. That cost was not only the in-
vestigation and the examination of what happened, but also the re-
covery  of  the  Shuttle  itself  off  of  the  bottom  of  the  Atlantic.  But, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

16 

the Administration and the Congress supported NASA by replacing 
those  funds  that  NASA  had  to  use  for  the  cost  of  recovery.  Not  so 
this time. 

In  the  loss  of  the  Space  Shuttle  Columbia,  the  costs  of  recovery 
were $2.8 billion. NASA was forced by the Budget Office to eat that 
out  of  its  operating  revenue.  Thus,  that  was  the  reason  that  last 
year,  bipartisan  Senators  got  into  the  NASA  funding  bill,  the  Ap-
propriations bill, an additional billion dollars just to partially reim-
burse  NASA  for  the  money  they  had  spent  on  the  recovery  of  the 
Space Shuttle Columbia. 

Of course, at the end of the day, we couldn’t get the support and 
that  effort  was  not  successful.  So,  we’re  trying  the  same  thing 
again this year. 

The problem is that you start to run out of time, as it gets closer 

and closer to the time of the shutdown of the Space Shuttle. 

Let  me  ask  you,  Dr.  Griffin,  NASA’s  report  on  the  economic  im-
pact  of  NASA  in  Florida,  points  out  that  for  every  direct  job  at 
KSC,  it  is  multiplied  into  2.5  jobs  in  Florida.  The  question  is,  the 
reverse  of  that.  Do  you  anticipate  the  total  loss  of  jobs  to  be  2.5 
Florida jobs for every job that is lost at KSC? 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Yes, sir, that is the multiplier effect that we’re talk-
ing  about,  so—if  those  analyses  are  very  difficult  to  do,  but  if  you 
believe  the  analysis,  then  the  multiplier  effects  of  government- 
funded work at KSC is about 2.5 to 1, either up or down. 

Senator NELSON. OK. 
Now,  let’s  look  ahead.  Which  Space  Center,  is  going  to  manage 

the Constellation ground processing contract? 

Dr. GRIFFIN. That would be here at KSC. 
Senator  NELSON.  OK.  That’s  good  to  have  on  the  record.  Since 
the  processing  is  going  to  be  here,  that  ground  processing  contract 
is going to be managed at the KSC management level. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Yes. 
Senator NELSON. Mr. Cooke? 
Mr. COOKE. Yes, sir, that’s true. We have the ground—— 
Senator NELSON. Get a little closer to the mike. 
Mr.  COOKE.  We  have  the  Ground  Operations  Project  Office  at 

Kennedy Space Center which will manage that. 

But  irrespective  of  the  management—which  I  appreciate  that 
KSC  wants  to  manage  its  own  work,  and  that  is  our  plan,  but  the 
crucial  point,  in  terms  of  job  losses,  is  the  work  would  be  done 
here. I want to get that on the record as well. 

Senator  NELSON.  For  the  audience,  the  new  rocket,  is  called 
Ares, and the new spacecraft, which is a design like the old Apollo 
capsule,  only  it’s  a  lot  bigger,  is  called  Orion.  Together  the  whole 
thing is called the Constellation project. 

Has  there  been  discussion  about  locating  the  Constellation  sus-

taining engineering work here at Kennedy? 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Yes, sir, there has. And we’re considering where we 
want  the  split  in  the  work  to  be.  As  we  transition  from  develop-
ment  to  routine  operations,  you  then  raise  the  question  of  how  do 
you  handle  the  sustaining  engineering  for  those  systems,  and 
where should it go? And it has been our position that by and large 
the sustaining engineering work should wind up here at KSC. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

17 

Now,  that  would  be  a  change  in  our  paradigm  from  the  Shuttle 
era,  but  we’re  changing  what  we’re  doing.  In  order  to  return  the 
United  States  astronauts  and  our  international  partners  to  the 
Moon,  we  have  a  suite  of  development  projects  which  must  take 
place.  And  so  the  development  centers—Johnson  and  Marshall— 
will  be  continuously  busy  with  the  development  of  new  systems, 
and  here  at  KSC,  folks  will  be  continuously  busy  with  operating 
systems that have been developed. So, we think, in large measure, 
that  the  balance  of  sustaining  engineering  will  probably  wind  up 
being here. That will be a difference from past practice. 

Senator  NELSON.  Whereas,  under  the  Shuttle,  that  sustaining 

engineering was done at other Centers? 

Dr. GRIFFIN. That’s correct. 
Senator NELSON. It was done at Johnson and Marshall? 
Dr. GRIFFIN. Primarily. 
Senator NELSON. Well, that’s some good news. And of course, you 
don’t  want  to  venture  to  guess  how  many  jobs  that  might  entail? 
Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Well,  I  don’t.  Because,  I  mean,  to  be  very  honest, 
we’re  trying  to  give  you  the  best  bang  for  the  buck  that  we  can. 
The  objective  that  I  have  always  had  since  we  had  an  opportunity 
offered  by  this  President  and  this  Congress  to  return  to  the  Moon, 
the  objective  that  we  have  is  to  utilize  the  fewest  possible  number 
of people for launch operations and sustaining engineering, because 
that  reduces  the  cost  of  it,  and  then  within  the  context  of  a  fixed, 
overall NASA budget, that allows more money to be made available 
to do the kinds of things that I know you want to do, just as much 
as we do. So, the less money that we can spend on operations, the 
more we have for other things. 

It has then been my goal to move some new types of tasks down 
here  to  KSC  to  make  up  for  other  types  of  work  which  will  no 
longer be done. 

Therefore,  hence  the  assembly  and  integration  of  Orion  being 
done at the ONC building. Now, we have several more contracts of 
a  major  scope  to  let.  It  is  my  hope  that  we  can  do—it  is  my  hope 
that  the  winning  contractors  will  also  plan  to  do  much  of  their  as-
sembly  and  integration  work  here  at  the  Cape.  That  hasn’t  been 
done  in  the  past.  So,  we’re  changing  some  of  the  paradigms  about 
how NASA executes its business. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  I  think  whoever  the  next  President  is, 
we’re going to request that he keep you as Administrator of NASA. 
Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Drop  me  a  note  and  let  me  know  how  that  works 

out. 

other side. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  NELSON.  Mel  will  work  on  one  side  and  I’ll  work  on  the 

All right, before I turn it to you, I want to get this in. You know 
that  here  at  Kennedy,  we  have  an  expertise  in  logistics  manage-
ment. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Surely. 
Senator  NELSON.  Have  you  considered  developing  a  centralized 

logistics capability for future programs here at KSC? 

Mr. COOKE. I don’t think we’ve discussed that in great detail. 
Dr. GRIFFIN. We haven’t got that far, to be honest with you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

18 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  I  want  to  suggest  that  you  consider  that. 

Kennedy has that expertise. 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Yes,  sir.  Suggestion  accepted.  We’re  still  early  in 
our  developmental  phase,  and  I’m  not  dismissing  or  minimizing 
your point, we’ll note it down and we’ll take it under action. 

Right  now,  I’m  worried  about  the  problems  of  finishing  the  Sta-
tion  and  developing  new  systems,  and  I  have  no,  in  fact,  my—you 
know, I would love to be in a world where I was worried about the 
logistics for supplying Ares and Orion and returning to the Moon— 
that’s the place I want to get to. 

Senator NELSON. Senator Martinez? 
Senator MARTINEZ. That’s the exciting stuff. 
Dr. GRIFFIN. It is, yes, sir. 
Senator  MARTINEZ.  And  we  really  thank  you  and  your  team  for 
all  that  you’re  doing  to  minimize  the  pain  in  our  community,  and 
to not only lead the program, but to also be mindful of those prob-
lems and concerns. 

And  I’d  like  to  ask  this  question,  and  maybe  one  of  the  others 
might prefer to answer, but it’s up to you—tell me about that rela-
tionship  with  the  Russians,  and  tell  me  about—the  concerns  that 
we  have  all  voiced,  and  we  all  have.  I  understand  that  we  now 
have Medvedev as the new President, Putin has stood in the back-
ground. 

You know, I have been to Georgia, not the one that grows peach-

es, but the other Georgia. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  MARTINEZ.  And  these  people  live  in  constant  fear  that 
the  Russians  will  cut  off  their  gas.  And  not  because  they  haven’t 
paid their bill, but just because the Russians will use the supplying 
of  gas  as  an  instrument  of  international  politics,  as  an  instrument 
of  policy.  Now,  that’s  kind  of  foreign  to  us,  as  Americans,  but  this 
is the way they play the game. 

Are we concerned that in a moment in time when we might have 
no other alternative, that the Russians might decide that they’ll fly 
someone  for  us,  or  provide  a  mission,  if  we  were  to  do  something 
different  somewhere  else  in  the  world,  or  whatever  they  might 
come up with? I mean, have these discussions taken place? 

And  let  me  broaden  the  question  a  little  further—you  know,  if 
you—I  remember  they  had  a  return  to  Earth,  you  know,  OK,  but 
not exactly in the place that they had planned for it to be. As I re-
call,  they  were  700  miles  off  course,  and  so  operationally,  are  we 
concerned about the capabilities? And, you know, I understand you 
all  have  to  continue  to  work  in  a  positive  atmosphere,  but  I  think 
we  need  to  ask  these  questions  today,  about  what  is  life  going  to 
be  like  during  that  5  year  period,  when  we’re  totally  dependent 
upon the Russians for manned flight? 

Dr. GRIFFIN. I do understand, sir. I run NASA, and I need to stay 

out of world politics, and will. 

Senator MARTINEZ. That’s the great thing about being a Senator, 
we  can  build  rockets,  and  do  international  politics,  and  second- 
guess anybody better than anybody. 

[Laughter.] 
Dr. GRIFFIN. And you should be very grateful that I will stay out 

of world politics. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

19 

[Laughter.] 
Dr.  GRIFFIN.  With  regards  to  operating  with  the  Russians  as 
partners,  and  the  reliability  of  their  systems  and  all  of  that,  I’m 
going to turn that answer over the Bill Gerstenmaier. 

Gerst has lived in Russia, and worked with the Russians, in the 
course  of  our  Shuttle  Mir  program.  We  may  have  some  folks  at 
NASA  who  have  more  experience  working  with  Russians  than 
Gerst does, but not many. 

So, Bill? 
Mr. GERSTENMAIER. First of all, I can’t answer the political ques-
tions,  either.  But,  I  can  talk  from  an  engineering  standpoint,  and 
from a capabilities standpoint. 

We’ve worked very closely with the Russians, we work with them 
daily  onboard  Space  Station  today.  As  you  mentioned  earlier,  it’s 
an  international  facility.  We  have  to  coordinate  things  back  and 
forth—who  generates  oxygen,  when,  who  removes  oxygen,  we  pro-
vide power to the Russians, they provide re-boost to the Space Sta-
tion  for  us—so,  it’s  truly  a  cooperative  engineering  effort  between 
us and the Russians. 

And  from  a  technical  engineering  standpoint,  that’s  going  ex-
tremely  well.  We’re  very  good  partners,  we  exchange  data  every 
day,  we  are  in  constant  communication  with  them,  the  Space  Sta-
tion cannot fly with either country in charge, it requires both coun-
tries  to  work  cooperatively  together,  and  as  an  engineering  team, 
that’s been going extremely well. 

You  mentioned  the  Soyuz,  that  didn’t  return  correctly.  Probably 
the  most—thing  that  concerns  us  the  most,  is  that  the  instrumen-
tation,  or  propulsion  section  did  not  separate  correctly  from  that 
spacecraft, and that forced it to fly a different entry trajectory than 
we anticipated. 

Two vehicles have done that—the last two vehicles in a row have 
done  that.  There’s  currently  a  Commission  going  on  in  Russia,  in-
vestigating  that  activity.  Their  report  is  due  out  sometime  this 
summer. I have made one trip to Russia to go understand how they 
were progressing with that analysis, they were very open with me, 
they  showed  me  all  of  the  data,  they  showed  me  the  drawings,  I 
saw the physical hardware, I went through a detailed discussion of 
their  engineering  processes,  they’re  the  same  as  ours,  they’re 
searching  for  root  cause,  it’s  not  easy  flying  in  space,  and  they’re 
having  problems  understanding  that,  but  they’re  working  through 
it very well. 

I  will  go,  again,  to  Russia,  here  in  about  a  week,  and  I  will, 

again, get a chance to see. 

I think the thing that concerns me a little bit is the fact that we 
will have a single transportation system, not that it’s Russian, not 
that  it’s  another  country.  You  know,  when  we  had  the  Columbia, 
tragedy  if  it  wasn’t  for  the  Russians,  we  would  not  have  been  able 
to  keep  the  Space  Station  manned,  and  we  would  not  have  the 
Space Station we have today. 

So,  it’s  nice  having  two  transportation  systems  that  can  back 
each other up. And that’s where we want to get to—we want to get 
this CEV flying as soon as we can. We need stability in our budget, 
we need stability in our direction, we need to keep moving forward, 
we’ve  made  good  progress.  Doug  and  his  team  have  done  a  great 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

20 

job  of  moving  things  forward,  we  need  to  keep  that  momentum 
going  forward,  so  we’re  dependent  upon  the  Russians  for  as  short 
a period of time as we can, and then we can have, back to our dual 
transportation system, which is what we really want for Space Sta-
tion. 

Senator MARTINEZ. OK, I appreciate that good answer. 
I  suppose  that  what  we  need  to  do  is  to  focus  on  trying  to  mini-
mize  the  potential  for  the  political  issues  to  arise  that  might  give 
cause to that. And I know in many spheres, we work very coopera-
tively  with  the  Russians,  and  I  know  there’s  a  lot  that  we  do  to-
gether,  frankly,  when  it  comes  to  trouble  spots  in  the  world. 
They’re  greatly  cooperating  with  us  on  issues  relating  to  nuclear 
proliferation and in that regard I know that is a very, very hands- 
on  cooperative  relationship  just  as  it  is  on  the  space  program,  as 
you’ve described. 

So, I’m one of those that’s, you know, very optimistically looking 
for  a  very  good  strong  relationship  as  we  go  forward.  But  at  the 
same  time,  it  is  a  troubled  time,  it  is  a  troubling  sort  of  scenario 
we see that we would be so dependent. And I guess this issue that 
you mention, as well, just the fact that we’ll be relying on a single 
mode  of  transportation,  and  it  better  all  be  working  or  it  would 
be—really not good for the Space Station. 

Relating  to  the  future  here  at  KSC,  we  haven’t  touched  on  what 
the  second  panel  will  be  focusing  on  to  some  degree,  which  is  the 
alternatives  to  space  exploration,  in  combining  public/private  part-
nerships. 

Dr.  Griffin,  can  you  tell  us  a  little  bit  about  where  you  see  that 
future, and how do you see that incorporating into what we do here 
at the Kennedy Space Center? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Senator,  I  will  have  to  respectfully  say  I’m  not  an 
expert  on  those  issues,  and  we’re  supportive  of  them.  But,  how 
work  in  other  sectors  of  the  economy  could  blend  in  with  what  is 
done  here  at  KSC  to  support  East  Central  Florida  is  certainly  a 
goal I share with you, but one that I would have to—I hope to hear 
some  clever  ideas  from  future  panel  members,  as  well.  I  will  be  in 
a listening mode on that, other than a talking mode. 

Senator MARTINEZ. Good deal. Thank you. 
Senator  NELSON.  One  of  the  painful  lessons  in  the  layoffs  of 
Apollo was that when we ramped back up on the Space Shuttle, it 
was  hard  to  get  some  of  those  technical  positions  filled,  because 
people, since there was a big gap there, had packed up and moved 
away, and had left NASA. You want to comment on what you plan 
to do as we ramp up here? 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Well, we are, even now, beginning efforts at retrain-
ing  and  transition  for  folks  who  we  think  need  to  transition  on— 
from  Shuttle  on  to  Ares  and  Orion.  Some  types  of  folks,  for  exam-
ple, some types of skills won’t be needed. We won’t be having Shut-
tle  tiles  anymore.  So,  we  are  working  with  the  companies,  and  be-
ginning  to  work  with  other  Federal  agencies  and  State  agencies  to 
try  to  forecast  which  folks  can  transition  over  and  have  that  shift 
happen. 

Doug, do you have any more comments on that, or Gerst? 
Mr.  GERSTENMAIER.  We  have  a  couple  of  training  opportunities 
for  employees  to  go  begin  training  for  some  of  the  new  skills,  as 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

21 

we anticipate the work that’s coming, the new type of work we de-
scribe  may  be  less  processing,  more—not  quite  as  much  hands-on, 
getting  ready  to  go  launch  kinds  of  things  as  you  describe,  some 
of the other skills. 

We’ve  got  some  training  opportunities  for  folks  to  go  do  that. 
We’re  trying  to  make  those  available  to  employees.  We’ve  worked 
with the companies some flexibility in terms of time off, things for 
employees to do, the State’s been also supportive in helping us with 
some education classes along those lines. 

So,  we’re  trying  to  take  our  existing  workforce  that  knows  how 
to  fly  complicated  space  hardware,  take  that  basic  knowledge,  and 
then  apply  it  in  a  slightly  different  manner  by  giving  them  some 
skills on top of that. 

So,  we’ve  been  working  pretty  actively  with  the  various  compa-

nies to try to prepare for that activity, for the ramp up. 

Senator MARTINEZ. Mr. Cooke? 
Mr. COOKE. Yes, sir. 
Senator MARTINEZ. We do have USA processing for Ares I–X test 
launch next spring, so that’s using a workforce that has been work-
ing  Shuttle  to  come  over  and  begin  getting  skills  in  what  we’re 
doing,  and  we  have  worked  very  closely  with  Bill’s  organization, 
Space Ops, to figure out where we can get synergies between what 
their  skills  are,  and  what  work  we  need  to  have  done,  so  that  is 
a  part  of  the  transition  effort—something  that  we’ve  put  a  lot  of 
effort  into  and  continued  to  look  for  opportunities  to  begin  to  get 
the  employees  working  in  areas  where  we  will  be  going  on  Con-
stellation,  so  that  they’ll  have  those  skills.  And  I  know  that  Bill’s 
also  working—has  worked  a  couple  of  retention  activities  in  order 
to keep critical skills going on the Space Shuttle program. 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  And  further,  we’ve  looked  at  some  procedures,  you 
know,  today  we  use  a  lot  of  paper  products  to  process  our  vehicles 
here.  We’re  going  to  some  wireless  systems  where  we  no  longer 
need  to  have  paper  products,  we’re  actually  putting  those  in  place 
today in the Shuttle program, and that’s allowing employees to ac-
tually participate and use the system that will be the system of the 
future.  So,  they’re  actually  getting  real  skills  today  processing 
Shuttle  hardware  with  the  same  kind  of  paperless  systems  that 
they  will  be  using  to  process  the  next  generation  of  vehicles.  So, 
we’re  looking  forward,  and  we’re  trying  to  actually  use  those  sys-
tems and skills today, so they’ll be more seamless when we transi-
tion to the new systems in the future. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  this  is  good,  I  want  to  suggest,  addition-
ally,  that  you  take  the  experience  of  the  Base  Realignment  and 
Closure  Commission,  BRAC.  Specifically,  the  Department  of  De-
fense  worked  with  the  Department  of  Labor  and  the  Department 
of  Commerce  in  order  to  minimize  the  disruptions  and  to  help  in 
the workforce transition as they shut down military bases. 

And  so  the  Department  of  Commerce,  and  the  Department  of 
Labor,  having  done  this,  this  is  another  opportunity  for  you  to 
reach out. 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  We  have  begun  to  do  that,  specifically,  with  those 

two agencies, and we will continue. 

Senator  MARTINEZ.  I  just  have  one  last  question  when  you’re 

done. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

22 

Senator NELSON. Go ahead. 
Senator  MARTINEZ.  I  was  just  going  to  ask  about  the  current 
Shuttle  missions.  I  know  we  just  had  a  fabulous  mission  that  con-
cluded.  I  know  we  had  a  little  hiccup  in  some  debris,  apparently, 
was  visible  in  the—which  apparently  turned  out  to  be  of  no  con-
sequence.  Just  give  me  a  word  on  where  we  are  on  finishing  out 
the  Shuttle  program,  I  know  it’s  been  terrific,  how  we  got  back  to 
flight,  and  things  seem  to  be  going  very  well,  but  I  just  wanted  to 
hear from you on that. 

I  know  this  last  mission,  in  terms  of  what  it  accomplished,  had 

to have been very satisfying to all of you. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. It was, sir, and Bill Gerstenmaier is the guy whose 

job it is to get those missions executed, so I’ll let him comment. 

Mr.  GERSTENMAIER.  And  the  next  mission  we  have  will  be  the 
Hubble  Servicing  Mission,  so  we’re  going  to  go  back  to  the  Hubble 
Space  Telescope  again,  and  to  put  a  brand  new  set  of  optics  and 
upgraded  cameras  on  it,  repair  some  gyroscopes  on  it,  so  that’s  a 
very exciting mission—that will be this fall on October 8. 

Again, because that’s the first flight where we’re not going to the 
Space  Station,  we  have  to  have  another  Shuttle  ready,  in  case  a 
rescue is needed for the Shuttle that’s serving the Hubble, so we’ll 
have two vehicles out on the launch pads—one out on 39B and one 
on 39A. 

And  then  after  that  flight  occurs,  that  vehicle  from  39B  will  roll 
over  to  39A  and  will  carry  logistics  up  to  the  Space  Station,  and 
the  cargo  that  it’s  carrying  up  are  systems  that  will  allow  the 
Space—— 

Senator MARTINEZ. When will that be? 
Mr.  GERSTENMAIER.  That  will  be  November  10th.  And  the  idea 
there  is  to  carry  up  the  equipment  that’s  needed  to  increase  the 
crew size onboard Space Station to 6. You know, currently we have 
three  crew  members  that  stay  onboard  Space  Station,  but  we’re 
going to increase that to three—— 
Dr. GRIFFIN. Increase that to 6. 
Mr.  GERSTENMAIER.  Increase  that  to  6,  increase  it  by  3,  I’m 
sorry.  And  then  we’ll  bring  our  water  reclamation  system  up  on 
that  Shuttle  flight.  We’ll  bring  some  crew  sleep  stations  up,  some 
galley  equipment,  some  extra  exercise  equipment,  and  an  addi-
tional bathroom for the Space Station. 

So,  we’ll  be  prepared,  then,  to  increase  the  crew  size  in  the 

spring of next year, probably around May of 2009. 

The  next  flight  will  be  roughly,  we  think,  in  February,  and  we 
have  a  change  request  out  now  that’s  being  reviewed,  that  will 
bring  up  the  last  solar  array,  the  last  big  solar  panels  on  Space 
Station,  and  that  will  get  added  out  on  the  starboard  side  of  the 
Space Station, out on the S–6 side, or solar starboard side 6, solar 
arrays will be added to Space Station early next year. 

Then, the flight after that will be a Japanese-exposed facility, it’ll 
be  the  third  piece  of  their  laboratory  they  had  a  little  pressurized 
section,  and  then  the  big  lab  which  was  just  launched  this  last 
flight,  and  then  have  an  exposed  facility,  and  that  will  be  in  kind 
of the April time-frame of next year. 

And  then  there’s—beyond  that  there  are  about  7  more  Shuttle 
flights  to  carry  logistics  up,  and  essentially  outfit  Station,  so  it’s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

23 

ready  to,  essentially,  be  built,  be  completed  and  then  be  serviced 
by  commercial  cargo  transportation,  serviced  by  the  Soyuz  and 
serviced  by  the  CEV,  or  commercial  crew  transport,  whenever  it 
comes online. 

Senator MARTINEZ. Very good, thank you. 
Senator  NELSON.  Dr.  Griffin,  one  of  our  problems  in  the  past  is 
that  Kennedy  has  been  pigeonholed  as  an  operations  center.  And 
you know how I have talked to you about bringing research and de-
velopment here, to expand the role. 

So,  is  it  possible,  from  your  leadership  standpoint,  to  expand 

KSC’s charter, and include R&D as part of its charter? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Sir,  I—with  respect,  I  would  not  urge  that  we  try 
to make Kennedy a development center. We need development cen-
ters  at  NASA,  and  we  need  operations  centers.  Where  I  am  trying 
to  move  the  boundary  a  bit,  back—because  development  work 
would be removed from places that have it, and brought here. 

And  second  of  all,  it  really  would  do  nothing  to  address  the  job 
loss  of  the  people  whose  jobs  from  Shuttle  would  be  cut.  All  you 
would  be  doing  is  importing  development  engineers  from  other 
areas,  or  hiring  them  locally,  but  it  would  not  ameliorate  the  job 
losses of the people who would not be doing Shuttle operations. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  you  know  my  opinion.  We’ve  got  150,000 
acres  here,  and  expand  the  role,  other  than  being  an  operations 
center.  And  indeed,  you  have  had  some  good  news  about  the  Con-
stellation ground processing, and about the sustaining engineering. 
And I brought up the question of our overall logistics management. 
Once Ares and Orion become operational, could the program shift 

here to Kennedy Space Center? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Well,  that  depends  on  what  you  mean  by  program 

management. And again, I’m not—— 

Senator NELSON. Tell me what you mean. 
Dr.  GRIFFIN.  The  overall  program  management  will  include  de-
velopmental  efforts  for  succeeding  block  upgrades,  you  know,  we— 
our  equipment  can’t  stay  static  in  time,  as  well  as  improvements 
and  also  the  overall  Constellation  program  work  will  include  the 
development of Ares V, the heavy lifter and the Altair Lunar Land-
er, and then later on, surface systems for the Moon. 

The overall program management for those things needs to be at 
the development centers. I’ll call it a sub-set of that program man-
agement—the  operational,  the  execution  of  operational  could  well 
reside here at KSC. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  that  would  be  interesting.  When  might 

what? 

you come to a conclusion on that? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Too  soon  to  tell,  to  be  straightforward  with  you,  it 
was  a  significant  topic  of  discussion  at  my  last  management 
monthly. 

Senator  NELSON.  What  is  that  technical  term  again,  operations, 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Well, the operational program of flying the existing 
vehicle,  you  know,  when  it  is  developed,  within  the  envelope  of  its 
flight regime could well be managed here at KSC, and it is my view 
that it probably should be. But there are a number of subtleties to 
it  that  we  need  to  work  out,  and  so  I  would  not  want  to  give  the 
impression that those decisions have been finalized yet—it is a cur-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

24 

rent  topic  of  discussion  within  NASA,  as  we  seek  to  manage  our 
affairs efficiently. 

Senator  NELSON.  I  know  you  don’t  want  to  get  tied  down  on 
these  details,  because  you  just  have  it  under  discussion,  but  the 
overall  operational  program,  are  we  talking  about  Ares  and  Orion 
and its future, or are we talking about all the way to Ares IV? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  It’s  too  soon  to  tell,  sir,  and  I  just  have  to  leave  it 

at that. 

The  first  thing  on  our  plate  is  getting  Ares  and  Orion  developed 
and  working,  and  that  is  clearly  a  Developmental  Center  activity, 
in  conjunction  with  our  contractor’s  on  this,  Boeing  and  Lockheed, 
and ATK. 

When  that  development  program  is  done,  then  we  have  to  ad-
dress, I think, the transition of a development program to an oper-
ational program. I would like to see the operational side of the pro-
gram  managed  here  at  KSC,  and  I’ve  been  quite  forthright  about 
that. 

As  I  said  a  few  moments  ago  in  questioning,  that  represents  a 
change  in  how  we  do  business  at  NASA,  I  think  it’s  a  productive 
change, but it is a change. That’s as far out on that limb as I want 
to  go  right  now,  or  I  risk  saying  something  that  would  commit  us 
to  a  path  that  would  prove  later  to  be  stupid,  and  I  don’t  want  to 
do  that.  I  want  time  to  study  the  issues  to  make  sure  that  we  get 
it right. 

But  we  are  leaning  in  the  direction  of  including  some  new  roles 
and  missions  here  at  KSC  that  haven’t  been  done  before.  But  we 
want  to  do  it  right,  and  we  want  to  think  about  it  carefully  before 
we commit to it. 

Senator NELSON. I was asking Orbital Space to study the issues, 
as well, in the launch here from the Cape, and they chose, instead, 
to go and launch from Wallop’s Island. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. We did, sir. 
Senator  NELSON.  And  I  will  continue  to  ask  those  questions.  Do 
you have included in the President’s budget request for NASA, the 
contractor retention programs? 

Mr. Gerstenmaier? 
Mr. GERSTENMAIER. Yes. 
Senator  NELSON.  Thanks.  The  answer  is  yes.  OK.  And  tell  me, 
as you project out over the years in the chart that showed the high 
of  6,400  lost  by  2011,  nevertheless  the  civil  service  employment 
with  regard  to  the  Shuttle  Program,  stayed  level  at  1,000  at  each 
of the years, even in 2011, 2012, 2013. Explain that, please? 

Dr. GRIFFIN. I guess in the Civil Service side, we have a core side 
of  folks  that  are  going  to  be  doing  the  new  work  we  just  talked 
about,  you  know,  we  have  the  test  programs  that  are  going  to  be 
done  down  here,  we  have  some  development  associated  with  that. 
The Ground Processing contract management that we talked about 
earlier, that’s going to be managed here by civil servants. So, that’s 
where that workforce is going to be utilized in the future. 

The  Safety  Group  sits  here,  and  stays  the  same.  We  now  have 
common engineering down at the Kennedy Space Center like we do 
at  other  places  where  the  engineering  team  supports  more  than 
just  one  program,  they  support  all  programs,  so  as  the  Shuttle 
ramps  down,  that  same  engineering  team  that  supports  those  ac-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

25 

tivities, will continue to support engineering activities, but now for 
the  new  vehicles.  So,  so  that’s  the  basis  of  why  that  stays  flat 
through that period, in terms of civil servants. 

Senator NELSON. All right, thank you. 
Now,  as  you  know,  we  have  a  difference  of  opinion  about  flying 
one  additional  Space  Shuttle  flight.  You  have  responded  in  your 
letter to the House Chairman. They’ve passed the authorization for 
one additional Space Shuttle flight. 

You’re  operating  within  the  constraints  of  what  you’re  told  your 
budget can be, and I understand, you don’t want to take money out 
of Constellation in order to put it into an additional Shuttle flight. 
But, under a new Administration, if we were able to get the addi-
tional  money  for  another  Shuttle  flight,  over  and  above  what  you 
have  already  built  into  the  budget,  can  you  venture  an  additional 
cost  for  that  additional  Space  Shuttle  flight  that  would  be  to  get 
a  whole  bunch  of  scientific  experiments  up  to  the  Space  Station 
that you don’t have room for now? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  We  have  said,  I  believe,  in  that  report,  and  I  know 
that,  you  know,  I’ve  been  on  the  record  publicly  on  this,  that  the 
marginal cost of that additional flight would be a few hundred mil-
lion dollars, $300 to $400 million. I don’t have a more precise esti-
mate than that for you at this time. 

Senator NELSON. Will we be beyond the point of no return by the 

time we get a new Administration in place in early 2009? 

Dr. GRIFFIN. No, sir. The—we have an 18-month, basically, inte-
gration and operations template for a given Shuttle mission, it’s ap-
proximately  that.  So,  we  need  to  know—I  do  understand  that  the 
House  has  authorized  that  additional  flight.  You  do  understand 
that  the  Administration  considers  it  not  to  be  necessary.  In  the 
end,  of  course,  we  will  obey  the  laws  that  are  passed.  If  decisions 
are  made  by  approximately  February  of  2009,  that  sort  of  a  time-
frame—we could execute such a mission, then, in the late summer 
of 2010, and we would be able to do that. 

Senator  NELSON.  OK.  Well,  we’ll  continue  to  work  with  you  on 

that. 

Now, the critical piece of hardware that’s got to be decided as to 
whether or not you continue to build additional hardware is the ex-
ternal  tank.  That’s  making  the  assumption  that  on  the  last  Space 
Shuttle  flight,  this  extra  one  we’re  talking  about,  that  you  have  to 
have  another  external  tank  that  would  be  used  for  a  rescue  Shut-
tle.  At  that  point,  would  you  necessarily  need  that  extra  ET,  since 
the  last  Space  Shuttle  flight  would  be  going  to  the  safe  harbor  of 
the International Space Station? 

Dr. GRIFFIN. And that’s exactly the point. First of all, let’s all rec-
ognize that there does, at some point have to be a last Space Shut-
tle flight. 

Senator  NELSON.  But  right  now,  manifest  on  the  last  Shuttle 
flight in October of 2010, you’re still having a spare, external tank, 
are you not? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Yes,  we  have  a  contingency  flight  beyond  the  last 
Shuttle  flight.  And  we’re  looking  at  the  things  that  you  just  de-
scribed to see what makes technical sense, we’re looking at the ca-
pability of the Space Station to support an extended crew for a long 
period  of  time,  we’re  looking  at  the  robustness  of  the  Shuttle  sys-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

26 

tem,  by  that  time  we  will  have  flown  some  more  flights,  we’ll  con-
tinue  to  look  and  we’ll  make  the  right  trades  at  the  right  time  to 
go support what we need to go support in the future. 

Senator NELSON. OK. The reason I wanted to get that out is the 
fact is that if there were a change in policy in the new Administra-
tion,  we  would  have  that  additional  external  tank,  so  that  if  the 
choice were made by the new Administration to fly that additional 
flight of scientific experiments, we could, in fact, do it? 

Dr. GRIFFIN. We’re not limited on hardware. This was—— 
Senator NELSON. We’re not limited on hardware, exactly. 
Dr.  GRIFFIN.  This  is  a  policy  difference  that  you  have  with  this 
Administration,  which  I  represent,  and  it’s  a  fiscal  matter.  It  does 
cost  three  or  four  hundred  million  dollars  that  is  not  appropriated 
in our budget today, and that we—I cannot, in good conscience, sit 
here  and  tell  you  I  could  fly  that  flight  and  just  absorb  that  hit. 
Three  or  our  hundred  million  dollars  worth  of  content,  that  you 
have  already  approved,  would  have  to  go  away.  And  so  we  don’t 
have that money in the budget. 

Senator NELSON. And we understand that. You would have to be 

provided that additional money by the new Administration. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. That would be correct, sir. 
Senator NELSON. Yes, sir. 
Senator  MARTINEZ.  And  that  new  Administration  could  be  a  Re-
publican  Administration  or  it  could  be  a  Democratic  Administra-
tion. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  MARTINEZ.  And,  by  the  way,  it  has  to  pass  both  houses 
of  Congress,  including  the  Senate,  which  has  not  yet  passed  this. 

Senator NELSON. Right. 
Senator MARTINEZ. But, anyway. 
Senator NELSON. And speaking of that, the extra money that you 
want  to  put  in  this  year,  even  in  authorization,  as  we’ve  got  the 
authorization bill coming up sometime in July, it’s not a done deal 
to pass it through the Senate, because one Senator can ball up the 
whole works, and grind the Senate to a halt. 

So,  unless  you  have  unanimous  consent  in  the  Senate,  it  might 
be  tough  sledding,  even  to  get  an  authorization  bill  for  NASA 
passed. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Which was, in part, why I made the point that with-
in  the  context  of  our  current  authorization  and  appropriations— 
and  especially  appropriations—I  don’t  have  the  money  for  that 
flight. 

Senator  MARTINEZ.  Well,  the  new  Administration  budgets  the 

Congress appropriates—— 

Dr. GRIFFIN. That is true, sir. 
Senator MARTINEZ. And so, it’s going to take a lot more than just 
a  new  Administration  that  is  willing  to  do  that,  it’s  going  to  also 
take a Senate, particularly, that’s willing to do it. 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  I  regret  more  deeply  than  I  can  say,  that  when  we 
agree  on  so  many  things  that  we  have  this  continuing  controversy 
over this AMS flight. I deeply regret it. But at this point, I simply 
don’t have the resources to execute that mission, without removing 
resources  from  projects  that  have  already  been  approved  by  the 
Congress. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

27 

job. 

Senator  NELSON.  This  has  been  an  excellent  discussion,  it  has 
laid the predicate, for now, the discussion of specifics as to how we 
can transition the workforce. 

Dr.  Griffin,  you,  as  usual,  are  candid,  and  you  are  doing  a  good 

So,  we  thank  you,  we  will  ask  the  second  panel  to  come  up,  and 

as we are bringing them up, we will take a three-minute recess. 

[Recess.] 
Senator NELSON. Before we resume with our second panel—if we 
can  have  your  attention  back  there—I’m  going  to  ask  Dr.  Griffin 
if  he  would  make  one  additional  clarification  on  the  last  question 
that was asked of him. 

Dr. Griffin? 
Dr. GRIFFIN. Yes, thank you, Senator Nelson. 
In  hearing  what  was  said  in  my  mind,  and  talking  with  my 
NASA colleagues, I realized that we might have left some confusion 
in  place  in  talking  about  whether  or  not  this  last  flight  is  flown. 
In  the  draft  authorization  bill  that  you’ve  offered  up,  there  are 
provisions  that  require  us  to  keep  Shuttle  production  contracts 
open.  That’s  extremely  expensive  to  do,  and  that  leads  us  into  the 
$3  to  $4  billion  range  to  preserve  the  program  for  another  year, 
which  we—and  this  is  the  point  of  clarification—do  not  need  to  do 
to fly a final flight. 

Once  the  hardware  has  been  delivered,  if  we  are  allowed  to  con-
tinue  shutting  down  the  program  on  schedule,  as  we  planned,  the 
launch  team  can  launch  that  last  flight  on  the  monies  that  have 
been  appropriated,  even  if  it  comes  after  the  fiscal  year  boundary, 
because  the  money  has  already  been  appropriated,  and  normally 
you  give  us  two-year  money.  And  it  would  not  require  us  to  keep 
Shuttle production contracts open, thus allowing us to save consid-
erably more money. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  that’s  where  you  come  up  with  the  esti-

mate of $300 to $400 million, extra? 

Dr.  GRIFFIN.  Exactly,  exactly.  It’s  only  if  we  retain  the  oppor-
tunity to produce more Shuttle hardware by keeping contracts open 
that  we  get  into  the  multi-billion  dollar  range,  and  I  would  really, 
really want to avoid doing that. 

Senator NELSON. All right, thank you very much, Dr. Griffin, for 

that clarification. 

Dr. GRIFFIN. Thanks for asking. 
Senator NELSON. Yes, sir. 
We want to welcome the next panel. 
Lynda Weatherman, the President and CEO of the Economic De-
velopment  Commission  of  Florida’s  Space  Coast,  Ms.  Lisa  Rice, 
President of the Brevard Workforce Development Board, Mr. Randy 
Berridge, President of the Florida High Tech Corridor Council, and 
Mr.  Steve  Kohler,  President  and  CEO  of  Space  Florida.  We  cer-
tainly welcome you all. 

What we’re going to do is ask you to keep your remarks to 5 min-
utes, and is it OK with you that we just let them go, all, and then 
we’ll get into the questions. And there is a clock before you, so you 
can watch your time. 
Ms. Weatherman? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

28 

STATEMENT  OF  LYNDA  L.  WEATHERMAN,  PRESIDENT  AND 
CEO, ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT COMMISSION OF FLORIDA’S 
SPACE COAST 
Ms. WEATHERMAN. Thank you. Thank you, Senators. 
The Economic Development Commission of Florida’s Space Coast 
is  seriously  concerned  of  the  economic  and  business  impact  of  re-
tirement  of  the  Shuttle,  and  the  impending  gap  of  lost  jobs  due  to 
transition.  Earlier  this  year,  NASA  released  preliminary  estimates 
of  the  expected  employment  changes,  as  a  result  of  the  upcoming 
shifts in the workforce. 

Through  2010,  the  Agency  projects  between  5,700  and  6,400 
workers  will  be  displaced.  An  internal  EDC  analysis  of  the  higher 
job loss figure, using a widely accepted economic impact model, es-
timated  that  the  cumulative  economic  impact  to  Brevard  County 
over  the  next  3  years,  at  approximately  13,000  jobs  lost,  and  $650 
million in direct revenue. 

Since the announcement of the Vision for Space Exploration, the 
EDC  worked  to  develop  a  plan  of  action  to  mitigate  the  job  loss. 
The  first,  and  successful,  effort,  was  to  attract  and  build  the 
Crew Exploration Vehicles, Orion, in Brevard County. This was an 
immense  undertaking,  as  in  the  50  years  of  space  exploration  in 
the State of Florida, the state has never been successful in attract-
ing  the  manufacturing  and/or  assembly  of  a  launch  vehicle  of  a 
major component of such size. 

On  February  22,  2006,  Lockheed  Martin  announced  plans  to  as-
semble  the  CEV  in  Brevard  County,  contingent  on  securing  final 
CEV contract. 

This  will  result  in  400  direct  jobs,  and  at  minimum,  $35  million 
capital  investment,  a  first  successful—however,  initial—step  in 
mitigating the job loss due to the Shuttle transition. 

Now,  for  the  plan  of  action  to  mitigate  the  job  gap.  The  EDC 
strategy  is  centered  around  4  initiatives—number  one,  work  de-
rived  from  exploration  program,  mostly  our  Constellation-oriented 
programs;  number  two,  commercial  opportunities  tied  to  COTS, 
CRS,  supply  chain  business  opportunities,  satellite  and  assembly 
manufacturing  facilities;  three,  space  tourism;  four,  emerging  op-
portunities. 

Initiative  number  one,  exploration.  Key  one,  keep  the  Constella-
tion  Program  sold  during  the  change  in  Administration.  This  in-
volves  educating  the  Presidential  candidates,  shaping  platforms, 
and informing selected House and Senate members and staffers, re-
lated  to  the  importance  of  Constellation  to  the  state  and  Brevard 
County. 

Key  two  under  the  exploration  program:  get  work  tied  to  that 
and  bring  it  here.  Participate  in  a  development  and  implementa-
tion  of  a  plan  for  incumbent  contract  workers  during  a  transition 
period from Shuttle to Constellation. 

Key  three,  make  widespread  distribution  of  Central  Florida  sup-
ply  chain  study  results,  which  identify  several  hundred  high-tech 
companies  capable  of  satisfying  Federal  requirements,  this  will  be 
spoken more by my colleague, Mr. Berridge. 

And  finally,  key  four,  identify  and  bring  Constellation  programs 
here to KSC, not as a sense of entitlement, but in the same spirit, 
Senator  Nelson,  and  Senator  Martinez,  as  we  did  with  BRAC— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

29 

identifying  what  can  we  do  as  a  local  community  to  enhance  pro-
grams  being  brought  here,  what  we  do  as  a  partnership,  and  cer-
tainly not a sense of entitlement. 

Initiative  number  two,  commercial.  Key  one,  identify  and  make 
contact  with  each  potential  contractor  associated  with  COTS  and 
CRS, and International Space Station. 

Key two, maintain KSC as the gateway to space, promote the use 
of  utilizing  existing  launch  infrastructure  for  support  of  the  Inter-
national  Space  Station  for  cargo,  and  leverage  existing  workforce 
inherent in the use of Atlas and Delta. 

Key three, promote and support the use of launch capabilities of 
crew support for ISS out of KSC, the United States of America, and 
to address the U.S. human spaceflight gap. 

Key four, identify and characterize all support facilities that may 

be of use to COTS, or CRS contractors. 

Key five, identify and characterize those incumbent contract em-
ployees  that  may  be  available  to  support  commercial  launch  and 
processing opportunities. 

Key four, under commercial, identifying and promote to domestic 
and  international  satellite  and  relevant  component  manufacturers, 
the  competitive  advantages  of  locating  plants  in  Brevard  County. 
Initiative  number  three,  space  tourism—establish  and  maintain 
a  flight  operations  capability  in  Brevard  County,  maintain  aware-
ness  of  the  evolving  space  industry  and  promote  the  competitive 
advantage  of  Brevard  County,  and  work  with  our  tourist  industry 
to  promote  this  area—both  in  economic  development  and  tourist 
initiative. 

In  emerging  opportunities,  key  one,  maintain  an  awareness  of 
those  opportunities  that  involve  exploiting  KSC-developed  tech-
nology,  tracking  newly  assigned  R&D  tasking  for  KSC,  promote 
KSC as a gateway to International Space Station, and the National 
Laboratory,  market  the  national  Shuttle  Logistics  Depot  as  the 
Depot  for  continuing  support  of  Shuttle,  ISS,  and  all  Constellation 
programs. 

Number  four,  key  number  two  under  emerging  opportunities, 
lobby for closer cooperation between all Federal agencies that have 
an  interest  or  need  for  space-based  operations,  including  DOD, 
NIH, DOA, DOE. 

The  EDC  will  work  with  Space  Florida,  Enterprise  Florida, 
Workforce Florida, and the Brevard Workforce Development Board, 
and other state and county organizations. 

Senator NELSON. I need you to wrap up, Ms. Weatherman. 
Ms. WEATHERMAN. Yes. 
Senator  NELSON.  And  each  of  your  written  testimonies  will  be 

put in and become as part of the record. 

Ms.  WEATHERMAN.  OK,  and  one  sentence  and  I’m  done.  Thank 

you, sir. 

While  the  challenges  of  our  area  are  indeed  serious,  the  passing 
successful  actions  will  provide  a  template  for  future  actions,  how-
ever, the current potential recessionary economy, the need for sup-
port via Federal, State and local agencies is critical, and will deter-
mine the degree to which we mitigate the impending job loss at the 
Space Coast. 

Thank you, sir. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

30 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Weatherman follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF LYNDA L. WEATHERMAN, PRESIDENT AND CEO, 

ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT COMMISSION OF FLORIDA’S SPACE COAST 

Economic Impact 

The  Economic  Development  Commission  of  Florida’s  Space  Coast  (referenced  in 
document  as  EDC)  is  seriously  concerned  of  the  economic  and  business  impact  of 
the retirement of the Shuttle and impending ‘‘gap’’ of lost jobs due to the transition. 
Earlier  this  year,  NASA  released  preliminary  estimates  of  the  expected  employ-
ment changes at each of its centers as a result of upcoming changes to the agency’s 
program of work.1 

Through  2010,  the  agency  projects  between  5,700  and  6,400  KSC  workers  will  be 
displaced  as  NASA  transitions  from  the  Shuttle  Program  to  that  of  the  Constella-
tion,  before  the  center  regains  some  employment  as  it  ramps  up  in  preparation  for 
the new vehicle. 

An  internal  EDC  analysis  of  the  higher  job  loss  figure,  using  a  widely-accepted 
economic  impact  model  and  the  opinions  of  our  contracted  Space  Consultants,  esti-
mated  the  cumulative  economic  impact  to  Brevard  County  over  the  next  3  years  at 
approximately 13,000 lost jobs and $650 million in lost income: 

Estimated Economic Impact of Proposed KSC Job Losses* 

Direct 1 

Indirect 2 

Induced 3 

Total 

FY 2008–FY 2009 

Employment 
Labor Income 
Output 

700 
$44,800,000 
$210,693,460 

301 
$14,224,290 
$48,808,770 

419 
$12,236,400 
$37,767,010 

1,420 
$71,260,690 
$297,269,240 

FY 2009–FY 2010 

Employment 
Labor Income 
Output 

900 
$57,600,000 
$270,891,580 

387 
$18,288,370 
$62,754,130 

538 
$15,732,520 
$48,557,590 

1,825 
$91,620,890 
$382,203,300 

Employment 
Labor Income 
Output 

4,800 
$307,200,000 
$1,444,755,070 

Employment 
Labor Income 
Output 

6,400 
$409,600,000 
$1,926,340,110 

FY 2010–FY 2011 

2,062 
$97,537,960 
$334,688,630 

Cumulative 

2,750 
$130,050,620 
$446,251,530 

2,871 
$83,906,760 
$258,973,790 

9,733 
$488,644,720 
$2,038,417,490 

3,828 
$111,875,680 
$345,298,390 

12,978 
$651,526,300 
$2,717,890,030 

* All numbers negative; analysis assumes average annual wage of $64,000, per EDC Space Consultants. 
1 Captures the impact the initial job loss has on the KSC population. 
2 Captures the impact of decreased inter-industry purchases as KSC responds to decreased activity. 
3 Refers  to  the  impact  of  the  decreased  activity  that  occurs  across  the  Brevard  economy  because  of  the  lost 

income paid by all of the businesses involved, directly or indirectly (diminished household spending). 

Source: Economic Development Commission of Florida’s Space Coast (using IMPLAN economic software). 

Background and Early Success 

Since  the  announcement  of  the  Visions  for  Space  Exploration  the  EDC  worked  to 
develop a plan of action to mitigate the job loss. The first and successful effort was 
to  attract  and  build  the  Crew  Exploration  Vehicle  (Orion)  in  Brevard  County.  This 
was an immense undertaking—as in the 50 years of Space Exploration in the state 
of Florida, the state has never been successful in attracting the manufacturing and/ 
or  assembly  of  a  launch  vehicle  of  such  a  major  component.  On  February  22,  2006 
Lockheed  Martin  announced  plans  to  assemble  the  CEV  in  Brevard  County  contin-
gent  on  securing  the  Final  CEV  contract.  On  August 31,  2006,  NASA  announced 
the  award  of  the  contract  to  build  the  CEV  to  Lockheed  Martin.  This  will  result  in 

1 ‘‘Workforce Transition Strategy—Initial Report’’, National Aeronautics and Space Administra-

tion, March 2008. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

31 

400 direct jobs and $35 million capital investment—a successful initial step in miti-
gating the job loss due to the Shuttle transition. 
Plan of Action to Mitigate the Job Gap 

The  EDC’s  strategy  is  designed  around  four  key  initiatives:  (1)  Worked  derived 
from Exploration Programs (mostly Constellation oriented programs; (2) Commercial 
opportunities tied to COTS, CRS, Supply Chain business opportunities and Satellite 
Manufacturing and Assembly facilities; (3) Space Tourism; and (4) Emerging oppor-
tunities.  The  overall  goals  of  the  key  initiatives  is  focused  on  generating  new  (and/ 
or retaining existing) high skill high wage jobs in Brevard County). 

Those  Key  Actions  associated  with  each  of  the  four  major  areas  of  interest  are 

listed below. 
Initiative 1—Exploration 

Key  1.  Keep  the  Constellation  program(s)  sold  during  the  change  in  administra-
tions.  This  involves  educating  the  Presidential  candidates,  shaping  party  platforms 
and  informing  selected  House  and  Senate  members  and  staffers  relative  to  the  im-
portance of Constellation to the State and to Brevard. 

Key  2.  Participate  in  the  development  and  implementation  of  a  plan  for  incum-
bent contractor workforce during the transition period from Shuttle to Constellation. 
Note:  At  the  same  time  the  space  workforce  is  likely  to  decline,  the  demand  for 
aviation  workers  in  Brevard  is  expected  to  increase.  Hence,  it  is  critical  that  train-
ing programs be put in place to effect a smooth transition between these two sectors 
of the aerospace industry. It is also extremely important that the potential aviation 
employers  be  identified  together  with  a  characterization  of  their  workforce  require-
ments (skills, quantities and need dates). 

Key  3.  Make  widespread  distribution  of  the  Central  Florida  Supply  Chain  Study 
results  which  identified  several  hundred  Florida  High  Tech  Corridor  companies  ca-
pable of satisfying Federal requirements for small business participation in the Con-
stellation program(s). 
Initiative 2—Commercial 

Key  1.  Identify  and  make  contact  with  each  potential  contractor  associated  with 
COTS  (Commercial  Orbital  Transportation  Services)  and  CRS  (Commercial  Resup-
ply  Services  (of  the  International  Space  Station)).  Identify  needs  and  demands  of 
these  contractors  associated  with  COTS  and  CRS  so  that  we  can  respond  to  their 
specific business, investment and workforce needs. 

Key 2. Maintain KSC as the ‘‘gateway’’ to Space. Promote the use of utilizing ex-
isting  launch  infrastructure  to  support  the  International  Space  Station  (ISS)  for 
cargo and leveraging existing workforce inherent in the use of Atlas and Deltas. 

Key 3. Promote and support the use launch capabilities of CREW support for ISS 

out of KSC to address the U.S. Human Space Flight Gap. 

Key  4.  Identify  and  characterize  all  support  facilities  that  may  be  of  use  to  a 

COTS/CRS contractor. 

Key  5.  Identify  and  characterize  those  incumbent  contractor  employees  that  may 
be  available  to  support  commercial  launch  and  processing  opportunities.  This  effort 
includes making available the Supply Chain information referenced above. 

Key  6.  Identify  and  promote  to  domestic  and  international  Satellite  and  related 
component  manufacturers  the  competitive  advantages  of  locating  plants  in  Brevard 
County.  As  this  industry  sustains  and  grows,  the  need  for  additional  sites  in  key 
markets  such  as  the  U.S.  and  Florida  will  be  needed.  The  EDC  will  aggressively 
seek out this new diverse investment opportunity. 
Initiative 3—Space Tourism 

Key  1.  Support  Zero  G  in  establishing  and  maintaining  a  flight  operations  capa-

bility in Brevard. 

Key 2. Maintain an awareness of the evolving space tourism industry and identify 

potential flight operators and related ground based service providers. 

Key  3.  Market  Brevard’s  technical  and  tourism  capabilities  to  the  several  space 

tourism operators. 
Initiative 4—Emerging Opportunities 

Key  1.  Maintain  an  awareness  of  emerging  opportunities  to  include  but  not  lim-

ited to: 

a.  Exporting  KSC  developed  technology  to  Brevard  businesses  and  conversely 
promote  technologies  and  capabilities  of  those  same  Brevard  businesses  to 
NASA and the Constellation prime contractors. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

32 

b. Tracking newly assigned R&D tasking for KSC. 
c.  Promote  KSC  as  the  ‘‘gateway’’  to  the  International  Space  Station  National 
Laboratory. 
d.  Market  the  NSLD  (National  Shuttle  Logistics  Depot)  as  the  depot  for  con-
tinuing  support  of  Shuttle,  the  ISS,  and  all  Constellation  programs.  Addition-
ally,  promote  NSLD  in  support  of  commercial  and  space  tourism  hardware  ele-
ments. 

Key 2. Lobby for closer cooperation between all Federal agencies that have an in-
terest or need for space-based operations (to include, NASA, DOD, NIH, DOA, DOE, 
NOAA, FAA, etc). 

Note:  The  most  common  product  associated  with  the  activities  surrounding 
‘‘emerging  opportunities’’  is  likely  to  be  a  series  of  position  papers  suitable  for  edu-
cation and lobbying. 

Key 3. Identify and attract diversified industries to Brevard County. These indus-
tries,  not  directly  associated  or  inherent  in  space,  will  contain  high  tech  methods 
and  kindred  skill  mix  classifications  associated  with  potential  loss  workers  tied  to 
Transition.  This  key  initiative  is  best  noted  in  the  recently  successful  location  of 
Embraer on May 13, 2008. The assembly of the Very Light Jet (VLJ) Class Phenom 
100  and  300  in  Melbourne,  Florida  will  hire  200  technically  skill  workers.  Some  of 
these workers may be absorbed from the job loss tied to Transition. 
General and Closing Comments 

1.  The  EDC  will  work  with  Space  Florida,  Enterprise  Florida,  Inc.,  Workforce 
Florida,  Inc.,  the  Brevard  Workforce  Board,  and  other  state  and  county  organiza-
tions  together  with  companies  from  the  aerospace  community  to  accomplish  the  in-
tent of the Space Plan. 

2. Many of the companies expressing interest in doing business in the county have 
need  for  financial  assistance  and/or  incentives.  Accordingly,  part  of  our  action  plan 
is  to  develop  a  capability  to  define  sources  of  financial  support  and  to  serve  as  a 
‘‘broker’’ between the parties. 

3.  Virtually  all-prospective  employers  are  interested  in  workforce  quality  and 
availability  as  well  as  available  facilities  to  house  their  employees  and  operations. 
While  the  challenges  for  our  area  are  indeed  serious,  the  past  and  successful  ef-
forts  provide  a  template  for  future  actions.  However  with  the  current  potential  re-
cessionary  economy,  the  need  for  support  via  Federal,  state  and  local  agencies  is 
critical  and  will  determine  the  degree  to  which  we  mitigate  and  at  best  nullify  the 
impending job loss on the Space Coast. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you. 
Ms. Rice? 

STATEMENT OF LISA RICE, PRESIDENT, 

BREVARD WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT BOARD, INC. 

Ms. RICE. Thank you for allowing us to come before you and ad-
dress the efforts the Brevard Workforce Development Board is tak-
ing in regards to the Aerospace Workforce Transition. 

It  has  certainly  been  a  collaborative  effort,  and  I  thank  all  of 
those who have been involved. We’re very anxious to serve the com-
munity,  and  mitigate  that  impact  of  the  changes,  as  you  men-
tioned, Senator Nelson. 

In  August  2007,  the  Workforce  Board  released  the  Aerospace 
Workforce  Outlook  Report,  which  actually  talked  about  3,500  jobs 
being  lost,  at  this  point.  And  in  it,  we  also  address  the  need  to 
gather  stakeholders  to  determine  the  path  that  we  would  take  in 
this  workforce  transition.  Those  stakeholders  were  brought  to-
gether, and form the Aerospace Career Development Council. They 
set  up  work  teams,  and  the  result  is  $1.25  million  coming  in  gen-
eral revenue from the State of Florida in funds. 

It’s  the  implementation  plan  of  those  funds  that  I’m  going  to 
speak  about  in  just  a  minute,  however,  I’d  like  to  tell  you  very 
quickly about a bridge. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

33 

In  1989,  the  Oakland  Bay  Bridge  top  deck  collapsed  onto  the 
lower  deck.  Normally,  it  would  have  taken  months  to  bring  that 
bridge back into full operation. However, it was just closed for over 
30  days.  The  amazing  reason  that  it  was—had  a  quick  rebuild,  is 
directly  relevant  to  the  upcoming  changes  from  Shuttle  to  Con-
stellation. The winning contractor embedded his city’s workers, and 
the  city  inspectors  into  the  production  plans,  to  allow  for  a  quick 
design  to  development  to  implementation  cycle.  This  is  exactly  the 
type  of  forward  thinking  that  needs  to  be  applied,  and  it  is  what 
the  Workforce  Board  is  taking,  with  respect  to  retooling  and  re-
training of the aerospace workforce. 

The Board’s Transition Plan begins with a communication effort, 
focused  on  lifelong  learning.  We  know  that  we  need  to  engage  the 
workforce  in  skills  upgrades  for  both  Constellation  activities,  and 
for those who may venture into totally new phases of their careers. 
We look at this as both retooling for the aerospace phase, and also 
retraining for new careers. 

Additionally,  we  know  we  have  to  communicate  with  businesses, 
to  understand  the  emerging  skills  that  they  have,  and  that  will 
translate into skills training for our workforce. 

Our  second  component  involves  an  assessment  of  workers,  again 
understanding  where  their  skill  levels,  and  what  type  of  training 
needs  to  occur,  in  order  to  bring  them  to  the  skills  levels  needed 
for  Constellation  activities,  or  for  new  occupations.  So,  obviously, 
training is the largest component of our plan. 

We have already started with retooling of workers with Lockheed 
Martin  and  the  Orion  production  activities.  We  were  able  to  sit 
early  with  Lockheed  Martin,  and  determine  the  needs  that  they 
have,  and  this  has  really  given  us  a  jumpstart  with  their  workers. 
The  retooling  activities  are  essential,  if  we  want  to  model  that 
proactive stance that was taken with that bridge in California. Our 
workforce  has  been  through  a  lifecycle  of  a  space  flight  system, 
they are ready for a new challenge. 

Following NASA’s Systems Engineering Framework, our training 
is focused on common technical processes, we incorporate tools and 
methods, and we know we have to engage the workforce early. We 
have to recognize that the U.S. has not had a new space flight sys-
tem  since  Shuttle,  and  it  is  incumbent  upon  us  to  undergo  a  cor-
responding  organizational  and  skills  transformation,  one  that  has 
not been seen since Apollo. 

We have the talented workforce, now we can build upon skills by 
embedding their training into the design, the development, the pro-
duction,  and  the  implementation  phases  that  are  critical  to  Con-
stellation’s success. Embedded training is not a new concept, by the 
way, it was used with the International Space Station, where oper-
ations  people  were  embedded  with  the  design  and  development, 
and that allowed them both to share ideas and perspectives. 

Our  fourth  component,  and  final  component,  addresses  the 
human factor of the plan. It’s about the life changes that are occur-
ring with this workforce, already. We will provide career transition 
mentoring that’s designed to motivate workers, by moving through 
the  phases  of  transition,  helping  them  understand  challenges,  de-
fine goals, and develop realistic action plans. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

34 

In closing, Wayne Gretszky was often recognized as the very best 
hockey  player  ever,  and  when  asked  why,  Wayne  replied  that  he 
goes  to  where  the  hockey  puck  is  going  to  be,  not  to  where  it  is. 
Well,  that’s  exactly  the  same  approach  that  this  Workforce  Board 
is taking. We’re working now to increase the workforce proficiency, 
at  the  earliest  possible  stage,  while  in  complete  support  of  the  be-
ginning of a new systems engineering life cycle. 

Thank you for your time. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Rice follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF LISA RICE, PRESIDENT, 
BREVARD WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT BOARD, INC. 

Thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  address  your  committee  regarding  the  efforts 
of  Brevard  Workforce  Development  Board  (BWDB)  related  to  the  aerospace  work-
force  transition.  This  has  been  an  ongoing  collaborative  effort  and  I  thank  all  of 
those  who  were  involved.  We  are  anxious  to  serve  the  community  and  mitigate  the 
impact of the changes as much as possible. 

In  August  2007,  the  Board  released  the  Aerospace  Workforce  Outlook  Report, 
which  addressed  several  recommendations  including  gathering  stakeholders  to  de-
termine  the  path  for  the  workforce  transition.  The  Aerospace  Career  Development 
Council  (ACDC),  set  up  work  teams  around  workforce,  education  and  economic  de-
velopment  activities,  which  resulted  in  securing  $1.25  million  in  general  revenue 
funds for retooling and retraining the aerospace workforce. It is the implementation 
plan for these funds I will focus on in the next few minutes. However, before I begin 
outlining the plan, I’d like to quickly tell you about a bridge. 

In October 1989, the Oakland Bay Bridge top deck collapsed onto the lower deck. 
Normally  it  would  take  months  to  bring  such  a  structure  back  into  full  operation; 
however,  the  bridge  was  closed  for  just  over  30  days.  The  amazing  reason  for  this 
quick rebuild is directly relevant to the upcoming changes from Shuttle to Constella-
tion. The winning contractor embedded his workers and the city’s inspectors into the 
production  plants  to  allow  for  a  quick-design  to  development  to  implementation 
cycle for rebuilding the bridge. This forward thinking approach is the same one the 
Board is taking with the retooling and retraining of aerospace workers. 

The  Board’s  transition  plan  begins  with  a  communication  effort  focused  on  life 
long learning. Engaging the workforce in skills upgrades is necessary for those going 
to  work  on  Constellation  and  for  those  who  may  venture  into  totally  new  careers. 
We  view  this  as  either  retooling  their  skills  for  the  next  phase  of  aerospace  work 
or retraining them for their next phase of life. 

Additionally,  communication  with  businesses  will  provide  us  information  about 
emerging  skills  which  then  translates  to  training  requirements  for  the  workforce. 
Our  second  component  involves  a  workforce  assessment  to  understand  where 
workers need to improve to be competitive for Constellation activities. This will en-
sure that NASA and contractors take full advantage of the current workforce skills 
for the new spaceflight system. 

However,  not  all  workers  will  remain  with  Constellation  and  for  those  who  are 
ready  for  the  next  phase  of  their  life  the  workforce  assessments  will  be  valuable  in 
pointing the way to high demand, high wage occupations in the area. 

Training  is  the  largest  component  in  the  transition  plan.  We’re  already  retooling 
workers  with  Lockheed  Martin’s  Orion  production  activities.  The  ability  to  sit  with 
Lockheed Martin at an early stage to identify these training needs gave a jumpstart 
to the training processes. 

These retooling activities are essential if we want to model the proactive approach 
used  on  that  bridge  in  California.  Our  workforce  has  been  through  the  life  cycle  of 
a  spaceflight  system  and  they  are  ready  for  the  challenges  of  a  new  system.  Fol-
lowing NASA’s systems engineering framework, training is focused on common tech-
nical  processes,  incorporates  tools  and  methods,  and  engages  the  workforce  early. 
We  must  recognize  that  the  U.S.  has  not  had  a  new  spaceflight  system  since  the 
Shuttle and it is incumbent upon us to undergo a corresponding organizational and 
skills transformation that’s not been experienced since the end of Apollo. 

We have the talented workforce, now we can build upon their skills through train-
ing  embedded  in  the  design,  development,  production  and  implementation  phases 
critical to Constellation’s success. Embedded training isn’t a new concept as a simi-
lar  approach  was  used  with  International  Space  Station  allowing  operations  people 
to learn the system first-hand and offer operations perspectives from the start. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

35 

The  fourth  component  addresses  the  human  factor  of  the  plan.  This  is  about  life 
changes  the  workforce  is  already  experiencing  and  will  provide  career  transition 
mentoring  designed  to  motivate  workers  by  focusing  on  moving  through  the  phases 
of transition. Our staff will be there to help the workers understand challenges, de-
fine goals and develop realistic action plans. 

Additionally, staff will analyze customer education and work experience to provide 
direct  information  on  occupations  that  match  closely  to  their  skills.  As  training 
needs  are  identified  staff  will:  provide  information  on  available  courses;  enter  into 
individual  training  agreements  with  financial  support;  and  follow  up  with  individ-
uals throughout the training process. 

In  closing,  Wayne  Gretsky  was  often  recognized  as  the  best  hockey  player  ever. 
When  asked  why,  Wayne  replied  that  he  goes  where  the  hockey  puck  is  going  to 
be,  not  where  it  is  now.  We  are  taking  this  same  approach  in  order  to,  increase 
workforce proficiency at the earliest possible stage while in complete support of the 
beginning of a new systems engineering life cycle. 

Thank you for your time. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you. 
Mr. Berridge, of the Florida High Tech Corridor Council? 

STATEMENT OF RANDY BERRIDGE, PRESIDENT, 

FLORIDA HIGH TECH CORRIDOR COUNCIL 

Mr.  BERRIDGE.  Chairman  Nelson  and  Senator  Martinez,  thank 
you,  on  behalf  of  UCF  President  John  Hitt,  USF  President  Judy 
Genshaft  and  UF  President  Bernie  Machen,  thank  you  for  the  op-
portunity  to  share  a  brief  overview  about  our  Florida  High  Tech 
Corridor Council and our mission to attract, retain, and grow high 
tech  industry,  and  the  workforce  to  support  it  in  the  23  counties 
in the central part of the great State of Florida. 

We invest in research projects with companies, we invest in mar-
keting  projects  with  economic  development  organizations,  and  we 
invest in workforce projects with workforce boards, and community 
colleges. 

In  our  first  12  years,  we  have  partnered  with  more  than  250 
companies on 900 research projects, where we have put $50 million 
of  Florida  High  Tech  Corridor  funds  on  the  table,  and  the  success 
of  the  program  is  that  those  companies  have  put  more  than  $450 
million  on  the  table,  either  in  their  funds,  or  in  Federal  grants,  to 
do  the  research—think  about  it—with  the  very  companies  and  the 
very  industries  that  we’re  all  working  to  attract,  retain,  and  grow. 
In  that  process,  we  engaged  1,500  doctoral  and  graduate  stu-
dents, and 300-some professors to do those research projects. A co- 
ed came up to me last year and said, ‘‘This is really a retention pro-
gram,’’ and I said, ‘‘Yes, go to the head of the class, it certainly is.’’ 
We also invest in marketing projects, to market our entire region 
as  a  high-tech  region,  and  were  recognized  last  year  by  Core  Net 
Global  as  one  of  the  top  5  innovative  high-tech  regions  in  North 
America. 

We  do  that  by  partnering  with  our  economic  development  part-
ners and creative folks, like Lynda Weatherman, who come up with 
ideas,  in  terms  of  getting  more  contracts  for  existing  companies 
and  new  companies,  in  terms  of  the  very  subject  we’re  talking 
about  today.  So,  we’re  proud  to  invest  in  the  program  that,  that 
Lynda came forth with. 

We  also  invest  in  workforce  projects  with  our  community  col-
leges,  and  I’d  like  to  single  out  Jim  Drake,  with  Brevard  Commu-
nity  College.  We  invested—thanks  to  Tom  Gamble,  God  rest  his 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

36 

soul—we invested more than $100,000 in a recertification program 
for their existing, nationally recognized aerospace technician recer-
tification  program—think  about  that,  helping  re-certify  a  recertifi-
cation program. 

I’d  like  to  share  with  you  in  this  setting—I  realize  it’s  a  public 
setting—Enterprise  Florida  hosted  a  gathering  of  the  CEO  and 
members  of  his  team,  of  a  rather  large  company  that  was  looking 
to  do  an  expansion  in  our  great  state.  We  had  dinner  with  the 
CEO. And in that dinner, he indicated that Florida was not on the 
top  3  states  that  he  was  considering  for  that  expansion.  And  one 
of the members of the team at that dinner asked him why, and he 
said,  ‘‘Well,  I’m  really  concerned  that  I  can’t  find  the  engineers, 
some  200  that  I  need  out  of  the  600  employees  that  I’m  going  to 
hire  for  this  expansion,  I  don’t  believe  I  can  find  the  engineers  in 
Florida that I need to do this project.’’ 

I  asked  him  if  he  was  familiar  with  the  imminent  transition  of 
the  Shuttle  to  the  new—I  didn’t  get  past  the  word  ‘‘new,’’  Chair-
man Nelson, he cut me in mid-sentence—he said, ‘‘You’ve just come 
to  the  top  3  in  terms  of  states  we’re  considering.’’  It  hit  him  that 
the  potential  for  this  entire  region  is  to  help  Brevard  County  and 
help others in terms of mitigating the results of this surplus. 

So,  the  Florida  High  Tech  Corridor  Council  is  here  to  serve, 
through research projects, helping our marketing friends, and help-
ing our workforce friends, in this charge that you have. 

Thank you for the time. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Berridge follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RANDY BERRIDGE, PRESIDENT, 

FLORIDA HIGH TECH CORRIDOR COUNCIL 

On  behalf  of  UCF  President  John  Hitt,  USF  President  Judy  Genshaft,  UF  Presi-
dent Bernie Machen, co-chairs of the Florida High Tech Corridor Council, thank you 
for  the  opportunity  to  present  a  brief  summary  of  our  23-county  Florida  High  Tech 
Corridor Council (FHTCC). Our mission is to attract, retain and grow high tech in-
dustry through our Matching Grants Research Program (MGRP) as well as through 
our  marketing  and  workforce  initiatives.  On  behalf  of  our  three  research  univer-
sities,  our  council,  our  core  team,  our  economic  development,  workforce,  academic, 
corporate,  governmental  and  community  partners  we  hope  that  we  can  add  value 
to the region’s efforts during this time of transition. 

Let  me  first  start  by  providing  a  very  brief  background  about  the  Florida  High 
Tech Corridor Council (FHTCC). A dozen years ago, the presidents of the two major 
research universities on the I–4 Corridor, Dr. John Hitt at the University of Central 
Florida and then University of South Florida President Betty Castor, recognized the 
benefits  of  working  together  to  provide  research  and  other  support  needed  by  high 
tech,  high  wage  industry.  Through  designation  by  the  Florida  Legislature  the  Flor-
ida  High  Tech  Corridor  Council  was  formed  in  1996.  The  University  of  Florida 
joined the Corridor Council in 2005. 

Our  Council  recently  commissioned  a  study  to  analyze  the  impact  of  our  unique 
public-private  partnership  that  engages  university  researchers  with  corporate  enti-
ties seeking technological breakthroughs. 

The  results  are  outstanding:  During  the  first  12  years  of  operation,  the  FHTCC, 
through its Matching Grants Research Program, delivered an incredible 9-fold return 
on investment . . . $450 million on an initial investment of just $50 million. 

The  basics  are  this:  From  July  1996  to  June  2008,  FHTCC  invested  $50  million 
in  900  applied  research  projects  with  more  than  250  Corridor  companies  . . .  at-
tracting  $450  million  in  corporate  and  Federal  matching  grants.  Importantly,  these 
figures  do  not  include  the  application  of  a  3  to  1  multiplier  commonly  used  in  eco-
nomic development assessments. 

The  sheer  numbers  and  return  on  investment  are  impressive,  but  the  real  story 
is  what’s  behind  them.  Each  applied  research  project  involved  the  keen  minds  of 
professors  and  students  at  the  Corridor’s  three  renowned  universities  (the  Univer-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

37 

sity  of  Central  Florida,  the  University  of  South  Florida  and  the  University  of  Flor-
ida) and their corporate partners at companies large and small. Let me give you just 
a few highlights: 

• 20  participating  companies  leveraged  our  grants  to  attract  60  Federal  SBIR/ 

STTR grants worth $12 million. 
&One such company is Rini Technologies Inc. Its scientists and engineers, along 
with  UCF  professors,  have  conducted  applied  research  on  a  new  system  to  cool 
laser weapons. Let me quote Dan Rini: ‘‘Without a doubt, the FHTCC matching 
grants  research  program  had  a  measurable  impact.  The  structure  of  the  pro-
gram  is  well  thought-out,  and  it  pays  dividends.  Without  the  program,  more 
than likely I would not be in business.’’ 

nies. 

than 130 additional patents are pending. 

• More  than  100  patents  have  been  awarded  to  participating  partners  and  more 
• 8 new companies have been created. 
• 7  new  centers  of  research  have  evolved,  thanks  in  part  to  our  FHTCC  support. 
• 1,500  graduate  students  have  been  engaged  in  these  applied  research  projects. 
• More  than  120  of  those  students  have  been  hired  by  the  participating  compa-
• 300 faculty members from the three universities have guided the research. 
These  applied  research  projects  have  generated  countless  technological  break-
throughs,  ranging  from  improved  medical  therapies  and  treatments,  to  vastly  more 
efficient  lasers,  satellite  communications,  computing  ability  and  power  generation. 
Whether  for  military,  industrial  or  consumer  applications,  there  are  far  too  many 
technological accomplishments to list here. 

The  study  clearly  demonstrates  that  the  Matching  Grants  Research  Program 
(MGRP) produces vast, tangible benefits for the companies that UCF, USF, and UF 
partner with in Florida’s High Tech Corridor and for the state’s economy as a whole. 
Whether  it’s  developing  new  intellectual  property,  building  a  highly  skilled  work-
force,  obtaining  specialized  equipment  for  our  universities,  creating  new  companies 
to  commercialize  emerging  technologies  . . .  or  achieving  technological  break-
throughs that improve the human condition . . . the MGRP, through the leadership 
of  our  three  universities,  has  consistently  delivered  a  tremendous  return  on  invest-
ment  through  this  unique  partnership  with  corporations,  the  state  and  the  Federal 
Government. 

As  we  have  noted  earlier,  with  the  mission  to  attract,  retain  and  grow  high  tech 
industry  in  our  23-county  Corridor,  FHTCC  invests  the  majority  of  its  state  funds 
in  its  MGRP,  benefiting  companies  in  the  varied  industries  we  are  working  to  at-
tract, retain and grow. FHTCC focuses matching grants on the following industries 
targeted  for  growth:  Agritechnology;  Aviation  and  Aerospace;  Digital  Media/Inter-
active Entertainment; Financial Services; Information Technology; Life Sciences and 
Medical  Technologies;  Microelectronics/Nanotechnology;  Modeling,  Simulation  and 
Training; Optics and Photonics; and, Sustainable Energy. 

In  addition  to  a  recognized  successful  research  program,  FHTCC  also  invests  in 
marketing  and  other  programs  with  more  than  two  dozen  economic  development 
partners  throughout  our  23-county  Corridor.  So,  as  you  would  expect,  we  invest  in 
advertising, trade shows and conferences across the state, the Nation and the globe 
as a way of promoting our Corridor as a high tech region. We also invest with EDO 
partners  in  programs  designed  to  help  companies  in  our  various  industry  clusters. 
A  prime  example  is  our  partnership  with  the  Lynda  Weatherman,  President  of  the 
Space Coast EDC, and her associates, wherein we have invested in a program which 
she  is  managing  to  benefit  not  only  Brevard  County,  but  the  other  22  counties  in 
the  Corridor.  This  initiative  is  designed  to  help  companies  obtain  contracts  to 
produce  components  and  sub-assemblies  associated  with  the  new  crew  vehicle  as 
well as the manufacture of components for a variety of military equipment. 

The  third  major  area  of  FHTCC  investment  is  associated  with  workforce  pro-
grams.  We  have  invested  in  the  development  of  associate  degree  programs  by  our 
community  college  partners  in  the  areas  of:  Microelectronics;  Biotechnology;  Mod-
eling,  Simulation  and  Robotics;  Photonics;  IT  Security;  Wireless  Technologies;  and 
Digital  Media.  FHTCC,  in  partnership  with  Brevard  Community  College  (BCC),  in-
vested  $100K  in  a  project  designed  to  update  the  components  of  BCC’s  nationally 
recognized aerospace technician recertification program. 

In  addition  to  research,  marketing,  and  workforce  projects  and  programs  let  me 
conclude  by  showcasing  an  example  of  how  I  believe  we  can  help  Brevard  County 
and  the  region  mitigate  the  impact  of  the  surplus  of  employees  associated  with  the 
transition from the Shuttle to the new crew vehicle. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

38 

I recently attended a gathering at which Enterprise Florida and regional economic 
development  leaders  hosted  a  major  corporate  relocation  prospect.  At  that  dinner, 
the  CEO  of  this  prospect  corporation  shared  with  us  that  our  state  was  not  in  the 
top three locations he was considering for the expansion of his company. The reason 
he  gave  was  his  concern  over  his  ability  to  hire  some  300  engineers.  I  asked  him 
if  he  was  aware  of  the  surplus  of  some  6,000  highly  trained  engineers,  technicians 
and other personnel associated with NASA’s transition from the Shuttle to . . . the 
CEO  did  not  let  me  finish  the  sentence.  He  realized  the  potential  solution  to  his 
problem and told us that we had just made it into the top three. 

This  community  of  state,  regional,  county  and  city  governmental,  academic,  cor-
porate, workforce, economic development, and community leaders have and will con-
tinue  to  work  together  with  NASA  to  resolve  issues  associated  with  the  imminent 
surplus of some truly outstanding employees. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you. 
Mr. Kohler, of Space Florida? 

STATEMENT OF STEVE KOHLER, PRESIDENT, SPACE FLORIDA 
Mr.  KOHLER.  Thank  you,  Senator  Nelson,  Senator  Martinez.  It’s 

our pleasure to be here. 

As  you  are  aware,  Space  Florida  is  a  special  district  created  by 
an  Act  of  the  Florida  legislature  in  2006,  which  is  focused,  as  an 
entity,  on  the  aerospace  industry  across  3  sectors,  civil,  military 
and commercial. 

We’re  heard  a  lot  of  discussion  this  morning  up  to  this  point  on 
the—with  a  great  deal  of  appropriate  focus  on  the  civil  side,  with 
the detailed description of the activities at KSC and NASA. 

One  of  the  points  that  I  wanted  to  bring  up  at  the  moment  was 
the NASA bill that has made its way through for authorization and 
appropriations, although—as we heard—it may or may not survive 
in whole or in part through the process. There were some relevant 
items  in  that  bill  that  I  think  were  appropriate  to  draw  attention 
to. 

One,  there  was  an  inclusion  of  reference  to  the  development  of 
$150  million  toward  a  commercial  space  crew  vehicle.  Another  one 
was  a  reference  to  the  support  of  COTS–D  development,  which  is 
a commercial competition that would add to the current COTS com-
petitive environment. 

There were several references to the International Space Station, 
including  a  specific  reference  to  the  Life  Sciences  Lab  that  the 
State  of  Florida  invested  over  $30  million  in  developing  on  the 
campus at KSC, and the relevance to that relationship between the 
ISS, now designated as a National Lab, and the lab that the State 
of Florida invested in. 

Also,  there  was  a  reference  to  the  need  for  the  development  of 
enhanced-use  lease  policy  renewal,  which  is  a  critical  tool  that  the 
state,  Space  Florida,  and  other  entities  would  have  to  utilize  in 
order  to  develop  properties  on  that  150,000-acre  tract  of  land  that 
currently is held by NASA. 

In  addition,  there  was  a  specific  reference  to  the  need  for  an 
interagency  study  on  range  options,  and  range  access,  and  then  fi-
nally  a  reference  to  the  need  for  export  control  issues.  As  you 
know,  this  has  become  a  competitive  challenge  for  us—not  only  in 
Florida,  but  in  the  Nation,  in  order  to  have  an  effective  space 
launch capability, and commercial development capability. 

From  the  state’s  perspective,  and  Governor  Crist’s  leadership  as 
the  Chair  of  Space  Florida  Board,  and  his  designee,  Lieutenant 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

39 

Governor  Kottkamp,  the  legislature  in  a  tough  budget  year  in  the 
State  of  Florida,  managed  to  appropriate  directly,  $20  million  to-
ward  space-related  activity.  In  addition,  through  S.B.  2310,  di-
rected  1.5  percent  of  the  state’s  net  pension  assets  to  be  used  for 
R&D,  advanced  technologies—including  space—and  that  is  almost 
$2 billion worth of potential. 

And then, finally, in an informed consent legislation at the state 
level,  which  was  a  key  piece  in  order  to  maintain  a  competitive 
edge, if you will, to entice commercial space interests for the State 
of Florida. 

Last week, our Board of Directors met, and we talked specifically 
on  three—among  many—elements.  One  was  the  assignment  of 
Launch Complex 36 to the state through Space Florida, for the pur-
poses of developing commercial space capability for multiple users. 
I  can  report  to  you  that  the  delivery  of  that  presentation  to  the 
45th Space Wing was made, where the Space Wing has now moved 
up the chain of command, and last week was presented to General 
Shelton, and we expect it to move on through to the 4-Star for con-
sideration.  It  is  critical  to  have  that  piece  of  infrastructure  to  add 
to the capacity that NASA provides here at KSC. 

We also continue to pursue horizontal launch access options, and 
our  relationship  with  NASA  KSC  included  the  signing  of  a  recent 
MOU  to  enable  us  to  pursue  these  kind  of  opportunities  for  devel-
opment of assets that exist on the campus. 

And  we  continue  to  work,  through  your  efforts,  as  you  might  re-
call,  the  assignment  of  Launch  Complex  40,  and  one  of  the  COTS 
competitors,  and  we  work  hard  to  develop  continuing  efforts  with 
that company as it completes its obligations to NASA. 

And  then  finally,  we  continue  to  work  toward  the  development 
of  a  Logistics  Center,  as  well.  We  recognize  the  importance  of  this 
skill set that exists that is unique to this range, and this base, and 
in  fact  is  unique  to  the  marketplace.  And  many  of  the  commercial 
providers have a distinct interest in that capability. 

Finally,  on  the  military  side,  we  are  supporting  research  at  UF, 
to develop a Blue Force tracking capability that would involve situ-
ational  satellite  awareness  development,  and  potentially  commer-
cial market application. 

We  think  that  these  are  the  kind  of  issues,  and  the  point  of 
drawing the attention to the relevance of those bill sections is that 
there  is  a  connection  between  what  is  being  considered  in  Con-
gress,  and  hopefully,  eventually,  enacted  in  law,  and  what  we  can 
do at the state level to leverage, in order to improve these opportu-
nities. 

Thank you, and I would be willing to answer any questions. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Kohler follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF STEVE KOHLER, PRESIDENT, SPACE FLORIDA 

Introduction 

Thank you Chairman Nelson and Senator Vitter: 
I  am  Steve  Kohler,  President  of  Space  Florida.  Space  Florida  is  a  special  district 
responsible  for  promoting  and  developing  Florida’s  space  and  aerospace  industry. 
More  specifically  we  were  created  by  the  Florida  legislature  and  the  Governor’s  of-
fice for the purpose of advocating for the space industry in Florida. 

I  want  to  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing  here  at  the  Kennedy  Space  Center 
to  address  and  bring  attention  to  the  issue  of  Shuttle  workforce  transition.  As  you 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

40 

all know, with the retirement of the Space Shuttle in 2010 approximately 6,400 jobs 
will be lost as a result. 

I  would  also  like  to  thank  you  for  working  to  get  an  additional  $200  million  in 
funding  for  NASA  added  to  the  Iraq  Emergency  Supplemental  package.  The  added 
funding is critical for NASA’s ability to return to flight activities associated with the 
Space  Shuttle.  This  funding  is  also  critical  to  help  close  the  ‘‘gap’’—the  anticipated 
time  between  the  Shuttle  retirement  and  the  launch  of  the  new  Constellation  pro-
gram.  As  you  know,  the  longer  the  gap,  the  more  stress  is  placed  on  the  Florida 
space  and  aerospace  workforce.  We  need  a  strong  retention  program  so  that  the 
skilled labor is in place when the new Constellation program is in full swing. 

Securing this funding will be a very significant achievement in such a tight fiscal 
year.  Space  Florida  is  pleased  to  be  able  to  work  with  you  and  your  colleagues  on 
such  an  important  issue.  We  will  continue  to  support  your  efforts  for  additional 
NASA funding to help shape the budget for the incoming administration. 

Additionally,  your  work  on  the  NASA  Authorization  bill  is  to  be  commended. 
While we realize the Senate version has yet to be introduced, your committee’s lead-
ership  on  this  issue  has  been  significant.  We  believe  the  House  of  Representatives 
has done a very nice job in working on a NASA Authorization bill that includes ad-
ditional funding for NASA as well as important range study and enhanced use lease 
language.  I  would  also  like  to  applaud  the  Space,  Aeronautics  Subcommittee  for 
working  in  a  bipartisan  manner  to  provide  NASA  with  the  tools  to  move  from  the 
Shuttle program to the Constellation program. 

However, I do think it is important to note that there are other options of return-
ing  to  the  Moon,  and  in  the  future,  Mars,  namely  Commercial  Orbital  Transpor-
tation  Services  (COTS)  D.  COTS–D  focuses  on  manned  spaceflight  and  would  work 
toward  creating  that  capability  in  the  commercial  sector  in  addition  to  what  NASA 
has  undertaken  with  the  Constellation  program.  The  job  creation  from  a  COTS–D 
program  would  fit  very  well  with  the  type  of  jobs  that  are  currently  held  by  NASA 
contract employees. 
Actions by Space Florida 

While the space industry in Florida is enduring a difficult period of time with the 
Shuttle transition it is important to note that Governor Crist and the Florida legis-
lature  have  done  a  tremendous  job  of  promoting  the  overall  space  industry  in  Flor-
ida. Florida is not sitting back during the Shuttle transition; we are working to sup-
port  your  leadership  and  are  bringing  the  Florida  delegation  together  in  support  of 
the space industry, which as you know is vital to the economy of Florida. 

Space Florida is uniquely positioned to advocate for the space industry especially 
because of the tools the State of Florida has given us. Space Florida has the ability 
to  work  with  the  commercial  space  industry  along  with  the  Governor’s  office,  the 
Florida legislature, the regional economic development groups, Congress, and many 
others. This flexibility gives us the capability to do tremendous things when working 
and advocating for the space industry in Florida. 

Space Florida’s workforce initiatives are focused on bringing new government and 
private  sector  opportunities  to  this  area  of  the  state.  We  have  partnered  with  the 
Florida  legislature,  Workforce  Florida,  the  Brevard  Workforce  Development  Board, 
the  regional  economic  development  groups,  and  many  others  to  help  to  bridge  the 
gap  between  Shuttle  retirement  and  the  advent  of  the  Constellation  program.  We 
have taken the lead to collaborate with the Florida delegation in a national leader-
ship  role  to  secure  funds  that  NASA  has  lost  due  to  the  Columbia  accident  and 
Katrina  setbacks  and  to  acquire  future  funding  that  is  vital  to  the  space  program 
here in Florida. 
Direct Action 

The workforce, as it relates to the Shuttle, has over time developed a very unique 
skill  set  that  we  are  working  to  keep  entrenched  here  in  Florida.  While  many  of 
Space  Florida’s  initiatives  to  improve  the  workforce  are  indirect  in  fashion  (i.e.,  in-
troduction  of  new  businesses  and  business  growth  to  stimulate  job  growth),  Space 
Florida  has  worked  with  the  Brevard  Workforce  Development  Board  on  projects  to 
address the Shuttle retirement in a more direct fashion. For instance, Space Florida 
has  awarded  the  Brevard  Workforce  Development  Board  with  funding  to  assist  in 
providing  aerospace  workforce  services  in  Brevard  County  regarding  the  transition 
of the aerospace workforce from Shuttle program activities to the Constellation pro-
gram.  Importantly,  Space  Florida  provided  a  $50,000  grant  to  the  Brevard  Work-
force  Development  Board  to  conduct  an  analysis  of  Space  Shuttle  retirement  impli-
cations with respect to the aerospace industry workforce in Florida. This report was 
completed  in  August  2007  and  provided  a  forward-looking  analysis  of  the  Brevard 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

41 

County and statewide aerospace workforce that will be impacted by the planned re-
tirement of the Space Shuttle in 2010. 
Indirect Efforts 

Additionally,  we  are  engaged  in  projects  related  to  improving  future  range  devel-
opment,  enhanced  use  lease  agreements  with  vertical  and  horizontal  capabilities, 
prospective trade and enterprise zones, and particularly future commercial space de-
velopment.  For  example,  Space  Florida  has  worked  with  companies,  including 
SpaceHab  and  SpaceX  on  different  projects  to  deliver  valuable  cargo  to  the  Inter-
national  Space  Station  (ISS)  in  the  future.  Further,  our  most  recent  project  with 
SpaceHab  will  establish  a  space-based,  biotech  corridor  that  stretches  from  the  ISS 
to the Space Life Sciences Lab here at NASA’s John F. Kennedy Space Center. 

It is important to note that all of these investments being made by Space Florida 
for different projects, as well as research and development, will help to mitigate the 
effects  of  the  Shuttle  retirement.  These  research  and  development  opportunities 
lead to job and new commercial partnerships at the Kennedy Space Center. For in-
stance,  our  collaborative  effort  with  the  University  of  Florida  on  Blue  Force  Track-
ing  Satellites  will  contribute  most  importantly  to  saving  the  lives  of  our  troops  in 
harm’s way. As you all know, projects like this can lead to additional research, man-
ufacturing, and thus new job opportunities in Florida. 

While many jobs will be lost as a direct result of cutbacks to NASA with the Shut-
tle  retirement,  I  think  it  is  important  to  keep  in  mind  the  many  indirect  jobs  that 
will also be lost as a result. Many NASA employees will likely transfer to elsewhere 
in  the  country  or  at  the  very  least  move  away  from  Florida  to  find  opportunities 
in  a  similar  field.  When  these  direct  jobs  leave  Florida,  and  particularly  Cape  Ca-
naveral,  businesses  such  as  restaurants,  hardware  stores,  and  other  ‘‘mom  &  pop’’ 
establishments  will  be  forced  to  close.  As  you  well  know,  this  will  lead  to  very  dif-
ficult  economic  times  in  Florida,  which  could  be  especially  difficult  considering  the 
current economic troubles our Nation faces. However, you have a great opportunity 
to help turn things around. 
Conclusion 

In conclusion, we will continue to partner with the Air Force, NASA, our industry 
stakeholders  and  other  states,  when  appropriate,  to  compete  to  attract  business  to 
Florida.  We  know  we  have  the  workforce,  infrastructure,  and  overall  mission  capa-
bilities  that  will  best  serve  the  national  interest  of  space  research  and  exploration. 
We thank you again for coming and look forward to continuing to serve as a full- 
time resource to the Committee and our Florida delegation whenever and wherever 
you need us. I look forward to answering any questions you may have of me today. 

Senator  NELSON.  I  was  deeply  disappointed  in  the  Orbital 
Sciences  Corporation  decision  to  launch  in  Wallop’s  Island,  Vir-
ginia,  instead  of  utilizing  so  many  tremendous  assets  of  pads  that 
can  be  converted  at  the  Cape  Canaveral  Air  Force  Station.  You 
mentioned going up the command of the Air Force, I’ve gone all the 
way to the new Four Star Head of Air Force Space, talking to him 
about  making  it  easy  for  you  guys  to  work  with  them  so  that  we 
can  convert  some  of  those  pads,  just  like  we’re  doing  for  SpaceX 
right  now.  Convert  them  for  commercial  launches,  other  than 
what’s out there with the Atlas and the Delta. 

Thank you for your presentation. 
Senator Martinez? 
Senator  MARTINEZ.  Thank  you.  Well,  you  know,  Mr.  Kohler,  I 
want  you  to  know  that  Senator  Nelson  and  I  will  be  working  as  a 
team, and anything we can do to make sure that Congress is there 
for these kinds of appropriations as time goes on. 

And following up, as well, I’m going to be visiting the Patrick Air 
Force Base after we finish here today, on the very topic that you’ve 
discussed—the  need  for  us  to  have  a  strong,  cooperative  partner-
ship,  so  that  the—the  seeds  have  been  planted  over  the  last  half 
century or more, here, of space exploration, can begin to now flour-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

42 

ish  as  part  of  a  broader  participation  by  the  private  sector,  which 
I think is really where the future ultimately lies. 

I just wondered if I could get a comment on those of you focused 
on workforce, as well as economic development, in reaction to what 
we  heard  today,  which  might  be  a  substantially  lower  workforce 
loss  than  what  we  had  been  anticipating,  and  what  your  reactions 
are to that? 

Ms. RICE. I would start out by again, going back to the fact that 
the Workforce Board did do an Aerospace Workforce Outlook report 
in  August  2007.  And  when  we  did  that  report,  we  actually  looked 
at some things that NASA didn’t. We sat down with the prime con-
tractors,  with  the  subcontractors,  and  we  talked  to  them  very  pri-
vately,  and  we  aggregated  their  information  to  come  up  with  his-
toric  retention  rates,  their  retirement  rates,  and  then  we  talked 
about  new  business  packages.  And  what  they,  as  a  company, 
thought  they  would  be  bringing,  or  could  bring,  and  estimates 
about the manpower that they thought they’d use. 

And that’s how we got to about a third of the workforce—not in-
cluding  NASA’s  workforce,  I  might  add—we’re  looking  at  about 
3,500  to  4,000  people  or  about  one-third,  retirement,  normal  attri-
tion. Another third, to new packages, new business work that these 
companies expect to be bringing in. 

Now, when I talk about new business work, it could very well be 
the  kinds  of  things  that  NASA  is  releasing,  or  it  could  be  new— 
completely new—business work that the company has in mind. 

So, that leaves us with around 3,000–3,500 that we see are with-
out a job. And that doesn’t mean that that’s the only place that we 
focused, because as I say, we have to look at the retooling, as well. 
Even if they’re going to go to new business packages, the skills that 
they  have  at  a  mature  level  of  a  life  cycle,  which  is  where  they’re 
at,  have  to  have  some  upgrading  to  match  with  that  new  infancy 
level, shall we say, of a life cycle of a new spaceflight system. 

So, we see it as both pieces—we’re looking at retooling for about 
3,500,  and  we’re  looking  at  retraining,  so  there  isn’t  a  job  loss,  for 
another 3,500. 

Senator  MARTINEZ.  Very  good,  I  noticed  in  Mr.  Griffin’s  testi-
mony,  he  mentioned  there  won’t  be  a  need  for  tiles.  And  obviously 
there  is  a  workforce  there  that  is  going  to  need  to  be  looking  at— 
obviously skilled, obviously talented, obviously needed—but they’re 
going to be doing something different going forward than what they 
were  doing  in  the  past,  and  that’s  an  interesting,  sort  of,  realiza-
tion. 

Ms. RICE. Absolutely. 
It is a challenging realization. 
Senator MARTINEZ. Yes. 
Ms. RICE. Because obviously one of the things that we don’t want 
to  create  is  any  type  of  a  panic,  where  people  feel  like  they  need 
to  be  leaving  right  now,  find  that  job  now,  thinking  what’s  going 
to  happen  to  me?  That’s  really  why  it’s  very  important  that  every-
one  here  at  this  table  works  together,  and  we  make  sure  that  the 
workforce understands that we’re there to help them prepare today 
for 2010, but that we’re also very cognizant of certain—occupations, 
like  tile  workers,  who  really  need  to  focus  on  what’s  going  to  be 
their next effort. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

43 

And actually, there are quite a few efforts that we’ve been in con-
junction  with—EDC,  as  well  as  Enterprise  Florida—the  Workforce 
Florida Board, which I do have to thank them very quickly, they’ve 
put in some dollars, as well, and we also have one of the Workforce 
Florida Board members, Belinda Keiser, here with us today. 

But  we’ve  been  working  on  different  industries  that  can  use 

those same kinds of skills. 

Did you want to say something there? 
Senator MARTINEZ. No, we—go ahead, please. 
Ms. WEATHERMAN. I was just going to say, the difficulty is know-
ing  what  tomorrow  the  skills  are  going  to  be,  a  challenge.  But  we 
could  actually  start  identifying  now,  the  CEV  that  we  referenced 
was  2  years  ago,  it  seems  like  a  lifetime  ago,  just  within  the  last 
6  weeks,  we  have  announced  Embraer  locating  here  in  Brevard 
County. 

Aviation,  not  aerospace,  but  technically  similar  nonetheless.  So, 
we’re  starting  to  develop  that  skill  mix  train  as  we  go  on  and  be 
more successful. 

Senator  MARTINEZ.  It’s  really  encouraging  to  me  to  see  what 
you’re doing locally, and how you’re pulling all of this together. Be-
cause,  we  know,  in  Washington,  we  don’t  have  all  the  answers.  In 
fact,  we  have  darn  few  answers,  and  it  really  does  take  a  commu-
nity coming together and working together with all of these various 
component  parts  to  ensure  that  this  workforce  has  a  place  to  go, 
and a future, and a hope. 

And  I  think  what  you’re  saying  is  exactly  right—we  don’t  need 
the  discouraging  words  to  now,  all  of  a  sudden,  panic  folks  and  so 
forth. Remaining here, giving them a way where they can see a fu-
ture for themselves and a future workforce, really is a terribly im-
portant part of the process. 

Well,  I  want  to  thank  all  of  you  for  what  you  do.  Randy,  great 
to  see  you,  and  your  continuing  work  is  very,  very  exciting,  what 
you do in that High Tech Corridor initiative is so important to our 
future.  We  wish  you  well,  and  if  we  can  be  of  help,  I’m  sure  that 
both Senator Nelson and myself would love to hear from you as to 
how we can be helpful. 

But, anyway, thanks to all of you. 
Mr. BERRIDGE. Thank you, Senator. 
Senator  NELSON.  And  I  thank  Dr.  Griffin  for  remaining  here  so 
that  he  can  hear  this  discussion  on  how  we’re  going  to  try  to  take 
care of our people. So, thank you very much. 

Ms.  Rice,  what  particular  industries  outside  of  space,  and  par-
ticularly,  spaceflight,  do  you  think  that  could  readily  utilize  these 
kind of workers? 

Ms.  RICE.  Actually,  there  are  a  lot  of  them.  First  of  all,  I  would 
definitely echo onto aviation. That is a very key industry. The aero-
space technicians that we have, going through Brevard Community 
College  and  SpaceTEC,  have  a  lot  of  similar  skills  that  flow  along 
with the aviation industry. 

In  addition  to  that,  alternative  energy,  especially  with  solar, 
since  we  have  the  Florida  Solar  Energy  Center  here,  it’s  a  Banner 
Center  through  WFI,  Workforce  Florida  funding,  there  are  many 
opportunities that will be coming out of that area. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

44 

Across  the  Corridor,  we  see  biomedical  growing  in  leaps  and 
bounds,  and  the  skills  that  come  into  play  there  are,  again,  very 
technical  in  nature.  They  require,  not  only  people  who  are  inter-
ested in life sciences, but people who are also mechanical in nature. 
There’s additionally, digital media that is taking on a whole new 
leap  and  bound,  and  I  heard  a  wonderful  presentation  at  the  last 
Florida High Tech Corridor Workforce and Education Council meet-
ing  around  digital  media,  and  what  it  is  going  to  entail.  And  it’s 
going  to  have  a  lot  of  the  same  kinds  of  things,  as  far  as  techni-
cians,  engineers—we  have  the  capability  to  walk  these  people  into 
other jobs. 

The  primary  point  that  I  think  that  we  need  to  focus  on,  is  how 
do  we  embed  that  training  as  early  as  possible?  And  when  you’re 
talking  about  it  with  Constellation  activities,  then  you’re  talking 
about something I heard very encouraging here today, which is the 
fact  that  we  need  to  be  having  more  of  that  production,  more  of 
that  design  and  development—yes,  I’m  going  to  push  the  envelope 
there and say that we’re not just operations and launch—and bring 
those activities, or at least embed our workers into those activities, 
so  that  they’re  working  faster  and  harder  together.  That’s  the  pri-
mary piece that I think we need to focus on. 

Mr.  BERRIDGE.  Senator  Nelson,  if  I  might—compliments  to  Lisa 
and  her  team  for  using  a  few  Corridor  dollars,  and  others  that 
you’ve  managed  to  scrounge  from  various  places,  to  do  a  study— 
not just in the Corridor, but around the state, in terms of potential 
openings that might fit the skills set. Don’t want to lose them from 
Brevard, for sure, we’re going to lose some, potentially. Why not be 
prepared to see where we might find opportunities for them in Or-
ange or Osceola, or Lake or Volusia, or other surrounding counties? 
Perhaps  the  family  could  remain  intact,  and  the  talent  could  be 
kept as close to possible where it is located now. 

Senator  NELSON.  Mr.  Berridge,  any  other  particular  industries, 
companies  that  you  think  would  be  attracted  here  because  of  this 
pool of trained employees that will be temporarily laid off? 

Mr.  BERRIDGE.  We’ve  seen  some  recent  reports  showing  the  in-
crease  in  IT  employment  in  our  region,  perhaps  bucking  some  na-
tional trends. So, there’s an opportunity. 

The  digital  media  mentioned  by  Lisa,  modeling  simulation  and 
training,  a  number  of  us  in  this  room  are  part  of  the  Military  Af-
fairs  Commission  in  the  Metro  Orlando  area,  designed  to  protect 
the  some  $5  billion  investment  that  we  have  there,  in  terms  of 
modeling simulation and training industry. That industry seems to 
be growing. 

So,  there’s  some  potential  of,  I  would  submit,  of  cross- 

pollinization. 

And  then  you  have  the  State  of  Florida  investing  close  to  a  bil-
lion dollars in the likes of Scripps and Torrey Pines, and Burnham 
and SRI, and what we’re trying to do to grow that bio-life sciences 
industry.  So  I’m—I’ve  got  to  believe  from  a  background  at  AT&T 
over  30  years,  there’s  got  to  be  some  potential  synergy  there,  as 
well. 

But  I  would  echo  the  comment—if  our  state  and  our  region  is 
willing  to  invest  as  much  as  we  have  in  research,  my  gut  is  that 
today,  perhaps,  didn’t  give  us  the  opportunity  for  a  full  vetting, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

45 

there’s  got  to  be  some  research  opportunities  that  we  can  partner 
on together. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  with  the  announcement  that  Embraer  is 
coming,  and  will  be  assembling  the  very  light  jet.  Then  depending 
on  the  Air  Force  tanker  contract,  that  now  looks  like  it’s  going  to 
be re-competed, were that ultimately to be awarded as it was, origi-
nally,  that  would  have  been  500  sustaining  engineering  jobs  over 
several decades, the life of that contract. But, it looks like that will 
be completely re-competed. 

So, there are these opportunities, if we stay on top of it. 
Ms.  Rice,  do  you  have  a  particular  message  here  today  to  all  of 
those  workers  that  are  concerned  about  getting  laid  off,  on  what 
they need to do to prepare for the transition? 

Ms. RICE. Yes, I do—thank you very much for allowing me to do 

that. 

The very, very first message is about lifelong learning. They have 
got  to  take  advantage  of  coming  out,  meeting  us,  we  have  a 
Brevard  Job  Link  Express  coming  out,  thanks  to  our  Space  Act 
Agreement  that  we  have  with  NASA,  we’re  bringing  that  out  onto 
NASA  facilities,  onto  the  Kennedy  Space  Center.  There  are  mul-
tiple  places,  they  can  come  in  and  can  access  our  services—they 
can learn about other occupations, they can learn about what kind 
of training, we’ll have workforce assessments out there—they have 
to  take  advantage  of  that.  If  they  don’t  walk  in  there,  they  need 
to  walk  into  one  of  our  one-stop  locations.  They’ve  got  to  do  some-
thing  to  increase  their  skills.  Assess  where  you’re  at,  take  advan-
tage of the training dollars that are available for you, and increase 
your skills. 

Senator  NELSON.  Thank  you.  And  if  all  of  those  folks  here  who 
are  reporting  this  meeting  will  help  us  get  that  word  out,  and  if 
this  meeting  is  still  being  televised  by  the  NASA  Channel,  those 
who are within the sound of our voices, please take Ms. Rice’s sug-
gestions to heart. Go and apply for that additional training. 

Mr.  Kohler,  I  wanted  to  ask  you,  General  Kehler,  and  Brigadier 
General  Helms,  the  Air  Force  has  had  a  new  attitude  in  working, 
it hadn’t been all so rosy in the past, but it seems to be a new atti-
tude  of  working,  and  trying  to  free  up,  particularly  some  of  those 
abandoned  pads.  Do  you  have  any  additional  suggestions  for  what 
we ought to be doing? 

Mr.  KOHLER.  And  that’s  correct,  Senator,  you’re  right,  it’s  had  a 
history—it’s  a  very  difficult  process  as  you  know.  You  have  a  mili-
tary range, a Federal property in NASA KSC, and actually, two dif-
ferent missions, as you well know—the U.S. Air Force’s mission for 
national  security  has  requirements  and  priorities  that  sometimes 
don’t  necessarily  complement  well  with  the  commercial  access  to 
space. 

And  so,  what  we  have  found—and  you’re  correct—both  at  the 
command level, here with General Helms, and right up through the 
chain of command, an awareness of the need to be able to in some 
way, integrate viable commercial space activity with an active mili-
tary  range.  And  somehow,  there  needs  to  be  a  way  to  be  able  to 
operate effectively and competitively on a global scale, in those en-
vironments.  And  I  think  that  the  work  that’s  been  done  with  re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

46 

spect to LC40 and SpaceX and their COTS award, has been a great 
pathfinder for our efforts to seek an assignment for LC36. 

And  as  a  consequence,  the  45th  Space  Wing  has  actually  oper-
ationally arranged for—as customers come to the range, looking for 
pad  assignments,  they  engage  Space  Florida  immediately,  in  order 
to allow a combination of business case evaluation to be completed 
on our side, with range technical access evaluation on the military 
side. 

This needs to continue, and actually needs to be more formalized, 
and I think you’re correct—my presumption is that General Kehler 
and  the  entire  command  structure  is  recognizing  that,  and  taking 
active steps to arrange for that kind of support. 

Senator NELSON. You mentioned in your testimony a space-based 

biotech corridor. 

Mr. KOHLER. Yes. 
Senator NELSON. Talk to us about that? 
Mr.  KOHLER.  Certainly.  We  had—and  this  is  in  concert,  in  co-
operation with NASA, actually, the STS 123 and 124, exampled by 
our support of SpaceHab, and their effort to do some salmonella re-
search  on  Station  in  the  last  mission.  We  supported  that  finan-
cially, and authorized an additional amount for that. 

And  what  I  mean  by  that,  conceptually,  is  that  we  have  the 
International  Space  Station  as  a  National  Lab.  We  have  what  we 
feel are very unique, differentiating capabilities at the SLSL, Space 
Life  Sciences  Lab,  in  that  you  have  technical  skills  that  are  able 
to  integrate  science  into  payload  processing,  which  then  the  com-
plicated matter of making that move from a laboratory to a launch 
vehicle  in  a  timely  fashion,  so  as  not  to  compromise  the  science, 
and then be able to launch it. 

The  concept,  basically,  is  to  be  able  to  connect,  in  a  real  sense, 
the lab and that work at the ground level with what exists on Sta-
tion, and could go so far as to even incorporate things that are rel-
evant  in  free  trade  zone,  foreign  trade  zone  activity,  in  terms  of 
being  able  to  create  that  kind  of  economic  opportunity  for  things 
that are done on-orbit. 

Senator NELSON. Mr. Berridge, the High Tech Corridor—you and 
University  of  Central  Florida—are  looking  at  these  space-related 
research and development opportunities. 

You want to comment on that? 
Mr. BERRIDGE. I spoke briefly on that just a minute ago, Senator 
Nelson, in terms of if you have the state investing close to a billion 
in major entities, including, in this metro area, the Burnham Insti-
tute. 

And  I  believe,  Lynda,  you’ve  got  a  meeting  coming  up  with  the 

Burnham folks in about a month? 

And then you have, thanks to Dr. M.J. Soileau, and Dr. Eric Van 
Stryland and others, UCF as being recognized as one of the leading 
laser photonics research facilities in the world. 

You have the investment that University of Florida, and Univer-
sity  of  South  Florida  and  UCF  have  made  in  meeting  the  state’s 
investment  in  terms  of  bio-life  sciences.  You  have  all  of  these 
synergies going on in terms of Brevard, and the Universities—UCF 
and  UF,  in  particular—and  I  think  the  goal  on  the  table  today  is, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

47 

we ought to have an opportunity to explore other research capabili-
ties. 

We  didn’t  exist  12  years  ago,  as  an  organization.  We’ve  invested 
in 900 research projects through our 3 universities with companies 
up  and  down  the  Corridor  in  a  host  of  technologies.  I  just  think 
there are some opportunities that could be explored. 

And you and I served together on the Founding Board of the As-
tronauts  Memorial  Foundation,  I’m  proud  of  that  fact.  I  just  think 
there’s  some  opportunity  with  some  very  intelligent  people  in  this 
room,  to  look  for  ways  that  we  could  partner  together—the  state, 
the region, and do some additional research. 

Thank you. 
Senator NELSON. Senator Martinez, any further word? 
Senator  MARTINEZ.  Well,  just  to  conclude,  let  me  thank  the  Ad-
ministrator  and  the  people  of  NASA,  as  well  as  the  panelists  here 
in the second panel. 

I want to tell you that in my view the Space Coast and the whole 
space program, as well as the people who work here could not have 
a  more  knowledgeable  and  passionate  advocate  than  Senator  Nel-
son. I think we all know how his life has been driven by the space 
program,  and  I  think  by  bringing  this  hearing  here  today,  he  has 
taken one more step in fulfilling that tremendous commitment that 
he  has  to  the  people  that  have  made  space  exploration  a  part  of 
their lives. 

So, anyway, I want to thank you, Senator, for bringing the hear-
ing  here  to  Central  Florida,  right  here  to  the  heart  of  the  space 
program, and for your continuing commitment to this effort. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you, Senator Martinez. 
We  want  to  thank  everybody,  particularly  Rosalind  Harvey  here 
at the Port Authority, who has set up all of this meeting today. We 
want  to  thank  everybody  for  coming,  and  all  those  folks  that 
braved the heat out there, and the thousand folks in the rally, and 
certainly we added a dimension to this hearing that we wanted to. 
Because  what  Senator  Martinez  and  I  wanted  to  do  was  to  give 
people hope and that’s what you all have done along with the testi-
mony of Dr. Griffin, and Mr. Gerstenmaier, and Mr. Cooke. 

We  also  wanted  to  give  them  a  glimpse  into  where  we  can  go  in 
the  future  so  that  we  can  continue  to  soar  in  the  heavens.  Part  of 
our  character  as  a  people,  is  to  be  an  adventurer,  an  explorer. 
That’s part of our character as Americans. 

And so, thank you all for having made this possible today. 
The meeting of the Committee is adjourned. 
[Whereupon at 11:45 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ALAN BERGMAN, REPUBLICAN CANDIDATE, 

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, FLORIDA 15TH DISTRICT 

Members  of  the  Committee,  Staff,  and  guests:  I  would  like  to  express  my  grati-
tude to you for letting me address you today. These are important matters, and the 
input  of  those  of  us  here  in  Florida  is,  and  must  be,  a  vital  part  of  your  decision-
making process. 

I  have  been  a  resident  of  the  Space  Coast  for  seven  exciting  years.  Just  as  all  of 
you,  I  have  seen  the  growth  of  our  space  program  and  the  socioeconomic  rewards 
it  has  brought  to  our  world.  As  a  direct  spin-off  of  the  space  program  we  are 
healthier,  able  to  live  longer,  more  exact  in  storm  prediction,  and  safer,  to  list  but 
a  few  of  the  advances  we  have  garnered  from  the  Space  Program.  The  many  thou-
sands of patents developed out of the Space Program attest to these facts. 

As a candidate for the U.S. Congress, 15th District, I have a deep concern for the 
welfare of my country as well as my district. I have met with Steve Kohler of Space 
Florida, Linda Weatherman of the Economic Development Corporation, and Brevard 
County Commissioners, among others, to seek insight on these matters. 

Drawing from my experiences as a community leader and in the financial market-
place, as well as the education that I have received at the feet of the various experts 
I have heard on the subject, I have reached the following conclusions: 

1.  The  government  should  not  bear  the  entire  responsibility  for  the  launch  fa-
cilities at NASA. I know we have been trying to bring in private entrepreneurs 
to  Florida,  as  exemplified  by  Space  Exploration  Technologies  Corporation 
(SpaceX). 
2. I have spoken to Fortune 500 companies about using our launch facilities and 
designing and developing programs for the manufacture of compounds that can 
only  be  created  in  the  unique  environment  of  space.  They  are  interested!  I 
would  be  happy  to  share  more  information  with  you  regarding  the  companies 
and  the  products,  but  I  am  bound  by  the  confidentiality  of  these  discussions. 
3.  I  would  suggest  a  division  of  Space  Florida  be  established  for  the  purpose 
of procuring commercial contracts with the private sector, to continue the work 
I  undertook  in  this  area.  Several  corporations  are  interested,  and  when  their 
competitors  learn  of  their  interest,  the  competitors  will  be  interested  as  well. 
This  is  one  of  the  advantages  of  our  capitalist  system,  and  should  be  respected 
as such. 
4.  I  have  been  reviewing  the  International  Traffic  in  Arms  Regulations 
(‘‘ITAR’’).  These  regulations  must  be  revised  if  we  are  to  allow  foreign  corpora-
tions  and/or  governments  streamlined  access  to  these  services  without  threat-
ening our national security. Efforts must be made to convince the various Exec-
utive Branch officials with the power to revise these regulations to agree to the 
need  for  ITAR  revision  in  order  for  Florida  to  remain  competitive  as  a  launch 
site  for  private  sector  space  ventures.  These  ventures  would  include  both  com-
mercial manufacturing and space tourism. The possibility of subcontracted work 
from the governments of foreign states also exists. 
5. The allocation of budgetary responsibility must also be revisited. Full cost ac-
counting seems unfair to private enterprises, since NASA would be maintaining 
these facilities whether they would be used by private entities or not. Marginal 
cost accounting for costs above NASA’s ordinary expenses without private sector 
access  and  launches  seems  a  much  more  appropriate  allocation  of  cost,  and 
would make our Florida launch site much more attractive to the private sector. 
At  the  same  time,  all  additional  costs,  including  without  limitation  heightened 
security  and  additional  maintenance,  would  be  passed  through  to  the  private 
sector. 
6. The Committee would do well to note that Florida’s Space Coast has an exist-
ing  trained  and  ready  spaceflight  workforce  that  is  about  to  become  seriously 

(49) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

50 

underemployed.  At  the  same  time,  we  possess  a  physical  infrastructure  that  is 
ideal  for  this  type  of  program.  Further,  our  geographic  latitude  allows  for  a 
higher  total  lift  payload  than  do  more  northern  latitudes.  Our  position  on  the 
Atlantic Ocean further increases our payload ability. Our weather allows the op-
portunity of many launch days per year. Any one of these features alone makes 
us  a  highly  desirable  launchsite.  All  these  features  together  make  us  uniquely 
qualified for this type of private-public cooperation. 
7. An added benefit of bringing these private ventures to Florida’s Space Coast 
is  the  reinforcement  of  this  area’s  economy.  Rather  than  uproot  the  uniquely 
trained  workforce  that  NASA  has  developed  in  this  area,  with  the  consequent 
disruption  of  family  life,  children’s  educational  experiences,  and  lifelong  friend-
ships built in longstanding neighborhoods by moving these ventures to another, 
less  astrophysically  desirable,  part  of  the  country,  I  contend  that  it  is  in  the 
best  interests  of  the  Nation,  industry,  and  our  citizens  to  keep  Florida  as  the 
physical hub of America’s space program. 

I  thank  you  for  your  time,  and  for  the  opportunity  you  have  given  me  to  share 

my views. God Bless America! 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARY L. LANDRIEU TO 

HON. MICHAEL D. GRIFFIN 

Question  1.  Can  you  generally  describe  the  impact  that  the  Ares  V  Program  will 
have  on  the  employment  numbers  at  both  the  Kennedy  Space  Center  (KSC)  and 
Michoud Assembly Facility (MAF)? 

Answer.  NASA  plans  to  conduct  Ares  V  final  manufacturing  and  assembly  of  the 
both  the  Ares  V  core  and  earth  departure  stages  at  NASA’s  Michoud  Assembly  Fa-
cility  (MAF)  in  Louisiana.  This  is  due  to  the  unique  capabilities  at  MAF  such  as 
the  physical  capacity  of  the  facility,  experienced  local  workforce  in  large,  human- 
rated cryogenic stages and access to the inter-coastal waterway and NASA’s Stennis 
Space  Center  for  testing.  After  delivery  of  the  core  and  Earth  departure  stages  to 
the Kennedy Space Center (KSC), stacking and final integration of the Ares V vehi-
cle will be performed in KSC’s Vehicle Assembly Building. Transport to launch pad 
39A  and  conduct  of  launch  operations  will  utilize  unique  KSC  facilities  and  local 
workforce experienced in integration and launch of NASA’s human rated space vehi-
cles. Specifics of workforce numbers for either KSC or MAF will not be known until 
contracts have been awarded. Initial contracts for ground processing operations are 
currently  planned  for  award  for  FY  2010;  however,  the  scope  of  Ares  V  content  for 
that contract has not been explicitly determined. Final prime contracts for develop-
ment  and  production  of  Ares  V  are  currently  planned  for  award  in  FY  2012.  Ares 
V will be the largest, most capable launch vehicle ever built. 

Question  2.  It  is  my  understanding  that  in  the  FY09  Commerce.  Justice,  Science 
Appropriations,  the  Senate  has  added  $30  million  to  the  Ares  V  budget  for  Early 
Risk  Reduction  Efforts.  If  this  funding  is  retained  in  the  bill,  what  impact  would 
that have on the long term schedule for Ares V? 

Answer. The additional $30M reflected in the FY 2009 Commerce, Justice, Science 
and  Related  Agencies  Appropriations  bill.  as  reported  by  the  Senate  Committee  on 
Appropriations  on  June  19,  2008,  would  not  change  the  currently  planned  flight 
milestones  for  Ares  V.  However,  this  additional  funding  would  reduce  risk  and  add 
confidence  in  meeting  schedule  and  will  aid  the  transition  to  development  for  Ares 
V in FY 2011. 

Question  2a.  If  this  funding  is  retained  in  the  bill,  how  would  that  impact  the 

workforce at both MAF and KSC? 

Answer.  Workforce  impact  at  NASA  locations  would  depend  on  the  specific  tasks 

and contracts that are yet to be awarded. 

Question  3.  What  type  of  schedule  impact  would  you  expect  on  the  Ares  V  pro-

gram from a 6-month Continuing Resolution from Congress? 

Answer.  There  will  be  no  schedule  impact  to  the  Ares  V  Project  resulting  from 

a six-month Continuing Resolution. 

Question  3a.  What  type  of  schedule  impact  would  you  expect  on  the  Ares  V  pro-

gram from a one-year Continuing Resolution from Congress? 

Answer.  Given  the  relatively  small  amount  of  funds  in  the  FY  2009  request  for 

Ares V work ($7.0M), there would be no impact to the Arcs V schedule. 

Question 4. As a result of the retirement of the Space Shuttle, NASA and its con-
tractors  could  soon  begin  issuing  Worker  Adjustment  and  Retraining  Notification 
(WARN) Act letters impacting thousands of workers at these facilities. With the cur-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

51 

rent live year gap until the Orion/Ares system is operational, NASA and its contrac-
tors would then turn around in about 2 years and start hiring workers for the Con-
stellation Program. This approach would essentially involve laying off skilled work-
ers  one  year,  then  staffing  up  2  years  later  for  the  same  type  of  skilled  workers— 
workers who, at that time, may or may not be readily available. 

Instead  of  the  traditional  WARN  and  rapid  response  protocol,  it  would  seem  to 
benefit NASA: the States of Florida and Louisiana; regional employers; contractors; 
and  employees  if  funds  were  invested  to  keep  workers  employed  during  the  gap  to 
ensure skilled workers remain available. 

Would  NASA  support  a  request  to  allow  both  states  a  waiver  from  the  Depart-
ment  of  Labor  to  utilize  Workforce  Investment  Act  funds  to  help  find  contract  em-
ployment for impacted workers? If not, please explain why. 

Answer. Retention of civil servant and contractor critical skills necessary to safely 
fly out the Space Shuttle Program manifest and enable the success of the Constella-
tion Program is a top NASA priority. As the Agency transitions from Shuttle to Con-
stellation,  NASA  plans  to  maintain  approximately  the  current  civil  service  work-
force levels. 

NASA expects the nature of near-term human spaceflight work to shift from oper-
ations  to  engineering  design.  development,  and  test  soon  after  the  Space  Shuttle’s 
last mission, and that the new Constellation vehicles will require less manpower to 
process  and  prepare  for  each  mission  than  Shuttle.  Reducing  manpower  levels  on 
the  new  vehicles  is  critical  to  the  success  of  the  Nation’s  exploration  efforts.  Given 
that the Constellation program is a ‘‘pay as you go’’ construct with milestones based 
upon  time-phased  activity  within  the  available  budget  provided  by  Congress,  Con-
stellation program requirements drive required workforce levels. From 2009 to 2011, 
NASA  will  hold  competitions  and  award  future  Constellation  contracts  for  ground 
operations  and  processing  of  Orion  and  Ares  I,  as  well  as  the  design  and  manufac-
turing of Ares V and Altair. 

NASA  purchases  products  and  services,  not  direct  labor  hours,  from  contractors, 
so  NASA  does  not  directly  manage  the  contractor  workforce.  Accordingly,  NASA 
does not issue WARN notifications to the contractor workforce, but rather the prime 
contractors  who  employ  the  contractor  workforce  take  that  action,  only  if  needed 
and according to their own policies. NASA continually seeks innovative solutions to 
the  workforce  challenges  associated  with  the  transition  from  Shuttle  to  Constella-
tion.  We  understand  that  the  Workforce  Investment  Act  (WIA),  under  certain  cir-
cumstances, authorizes the Department of Labor to allocate funds to state and local 
workforce  investment  boards  for  youth,  adult  and  dislocated  worker  training  serv-
ices.  There  are  also  a  number  of  restrictions  on  use  of  such  funds,  to  include  eligi-
bility  requirements,  time  limits,  funding  limits,  employer  match  requirements,  etc., 
which  the  Department  of  Labor  has  the  authority  to  waive.  It  is  difficult  to  judge 
the  merits  of  any  proposed  waivers  under  WIA  without  knowing  the  specifics  of 
what is to be waived and for what purposes. although it appears to be a matter be-
tween  the  Department  of  Labor  and  state  and  local  workforce  investment  boards. 
However,  should  the  Department  of  Labor  seek  NASA’s  view  on  a  waiver  request 
under the WIA; NASA would be pleased to review such a request. 

Accordingly,  while  NASA  does  not  seek,  or  advocate,  additional  retraining,  place-
ment  or  short-term  work  efforts  by  contractors  funded  within  the  NASA  budget,  in 
general,  NASA  supports  efforts  to  help  the  Shuttle  contractor  workforce  negotiate 
the  transition  between  the  Shuttle  and  Constellation  Programs,  whether  that  is  to 
prepare for Constellation or other NASA programs, migrate to other aerospace work, 
or even pursue other fields. As part of this effort, NASA has broadly communicated 
a  summary  of  the  Agency’s  future  contract  acquisition  plans—to  the  limit  allowed 
by the Federal Acquisition Regulations—so that potential bidders and their employ-
ees can see what future work will be competed for Constellation. 

Question  5.  NASA  receives  Federal  funding  for  its  Institutional  Assets.  Unlike 
other  NASA  locations,  the  Michoud  Assembly  Facility  (MAF)  has  not  traditionally 
been  considered  an  Institutional  Asset,  and  thus,  has  not  received  those  funds.  Fa-
cility  costs  at  MAF  have  instead  been  borne  by  program  tenants.  These  costs  are 
high  because  of  the  small  number  of  tenants  (the  lower  the  number  of  programs/ 
contractors, the higher their percentage of cost). As a member of the Senate Appro-
priations Committee, I would be interested to know additional information on facil-
ity costs at MAF. Has NASA conducted any studies to review the cost of doing busi-
ness at MAF compared to market value? If so, please provide any completed studies. 
If not, will NASA agree to conduct such a study? 

Answer.  Currently,  the  Michoud  Assembly  Facility  (MAF)  is  operated  for  NASA 
by  Lockheed  Martin  as  a  part  of  the  Shuttle  External  Tank  (ET)  production  con-
tract.  NASA  decisions  to  use  MAF  to  support  Constellation  projects,  in  addition  to 
the ET, drove an acquisition strategy which separates the facility operations, main-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

52 

tenance,  and  manufacturing  support  into  a  separate  contract.  The  diversification  of 
the  MAF  to  support  multiple  projects,  using  multiple  prime  contractors,  led  to  a 
NASA  Request  for  Proposal  (RFP)  in  June  2008  for  a  multi-program,  mission  inde-
pendent  contract  for  MAF  operations.  NASA  currently  anticipates  making  a  selec-
tion for this contract in December 2008. The use of MAF for Constellation activities 
and  this  particular  multi-project  acquisition  approach  are  intended  to  improve  the 
transition from Shuttle ET production to Constellation activities (skill retention, ca-
pability  preservation),  while  minimizing  costs.  Once  in  place.  this  contract  is  de-
signed to allow increased penetration of facility operating costs and incentivize effi-
ciencies  in  facility  operation,  maintenance  and  manufacturing  support.  The  effi-
ciencies  anticipated  will  be  informed  by  NASA’s  plans  to  conduct  a  study,  after  the 
new  contractor  is  in  place,  to  compare  NASA  MAF  facility  costs  to  market  rates. 
Question  6.  As  you  know,  there  will  be  a  new  operations  contractor  at  Michoud. 
It  is  my  understanding  that  there  is  currently  a  maintenance  backlog  for  the  facil-
ity.  The  maintenance  backlog  is  due  to  many  factors  including  Hurricane  Katrina, 
the  upcoming  retirement  of  the  Space  Shuttle  and  local  economic  conditions.  What 
is  the  current  status  of  maintenance  projects  at  Michoud?  Does  NASA  need  addi-
tional funding to address the maintenance backlog at Michoud? (Yes/no) If yes, how 
much funding would be needed? If no, why not? 

Answer.  No,  NASA  does  not  need  additional  funding  to  address  the  maintenance 
backlog.  The  current  status  of  deferred  maintenance  at  MAF  is  consistent  with  all 
NASA  installations.  In  addition,  Congressional  approval  of  the  Katrina  supple-
mental funding was significant in re-storing the facility to a good condition after the 
damage  caused  by  Hurricane  Katrina  in  2005.  The  supplemental  funds  provided  to 
MAF  for  Katrina  recovery  and  repair  at  MAF  totaled  $181.0M.  This  supplemental 
funding allowed repairs to the facility to be made ($69.0M). as well as implementa-
tion  of  important  asset  protection  measures  ($70.0M)  which  hardens  and  safes  the 
facility. 

NASA’s  approach  to  facility  management  is  to  achieve  an  appropriate  balance 
among  facility  maintenance,  capital  revitalization,  construction  of  facilities  and  the 
retirement and elimination of facilities that have no future requirement or have be-
come antiquated. 

Question  7.  Administrator  Griffin,  in  your  previous  statements  and  in  the  initial 
NASA  request  for  proposals  (RFP),  there  was  a  commitment  that  Ares  I  was  to  be 
produced  at  MAF.  The  language  was  softened  in  the  final  RFP,  allowing  alter-
natives  to  be  proposed.  No  language  about  design  was  included  in  the  RFP  lan-
guage. However, it is my understanding, that at this time the first two Ares I devel-
opment  units  are  being  built  at  the  Marshall  Space  Flight  Center,  not  MAF.  These 
units  require  large  investments  for  infrastructure  and  each  unit  will  cost  millions 
to produce. Once this investment has been made, there would seem to be a disincen-
tive to move production to MAF. 

For Ares V, you have also verbally committed that Ares V would be developed and 
produced  at  MAF.  Like  Ares  I,  however,  it  is  being  planned  for  the  first  two  Ares 
V  development  units  to  also  be  designed  at  the  Marshall  Space  Flight  Center,  not 
MAF.  This  will  mean  additional  investments  in  infrastructure  and  production. 
Again, there seems to be little incentive for NASA to duplicate the capacity at MAF 
once it exists at Marshall. 

Just  as  NASA  showed  a  strong  commitment  to  MAF  in  the  aftermath  of  Hurri-
canes  Katrina  and  Rita,  it  is  essential  to  keep  this  strong  commitment  from  NASA 
that work on Orion, Ares I and Ares V will stay at MAF. 

Is  NASA  still  committed  to  develop  and  build  Orion,  Ares  I  and  Ares  V  at  MAF? 

Would NASA support codifying this commitment in future legislation? 

Answer. NASA has been consistent in its commitment to complete final manufac-
turing  and  assembly  of  the  Ares  I  Upper  Stage  and  Instrument  Unit,  and  Ares  V 
core and Earth departure stages, at MAF. This is due in part to the unique capabili-
ties  MAF  offers,  such  as  an  experienced  and  abundant  local  workforce  with  consid-
erable expertise in human-rated cryogenic stages, the physical capacity of the facil-
ity,  and  access  to  the  nearby  Intercoastal  Waterway  and  the  NASA  Stennis  Space 
Center for testing. 

With  regard  to  future  legislation,  NASA  would  defer  to  the  next  Administration 

for guidance with respect to legislative proposals for NASA. 

Question  7a.  Please  explain  why  the  first  two  Ares  I  and  Ares  V  development 

units could not be designed and produced at MAF instead of Marshall. 

Answer.  For  Ares  I,  NASA  is  currently  planning  to  manufacture  and  assemble 
only one full-scale, integrated Upper Stage test article at the Marshall Space Flight 
Center  (MSFC)—the  Main  Propulsion  Test  Article  and  other  partial  articles  for  de-
velopmental structural testing. The ground vibration test article and all subsequent 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

53 

production  articles  will  be  manufactured  at  MAF.  NASA  has  made  no  decisions  as 
to  the  location  of  final  manufacturing  and  assembly  of  the  Ares  V  developmental 
units—this is forward work to the Ares V Preliminary Design Review (PDR). NASA 
is  following  the  very  successful  Saturn  model,  where  critical  manufacturing  proc-
esses  are  worked  out  prior  to  completion  of  design  in  physical  proximity  to  vehicle 
designers  and  unique  test  facilities.  This  is  also  in  keeping  with  best  practices  of 
industry. In addition, there are schedule conflicts within the MAF facility due to on- 
going  Shuttle  External  Tank  production  which  hamper  earlier  Ares  manufacturing. 
It  is  also  important  to  note  that  MSFC  facilities  arc  not  capable  of  ongoing,  full- 
scale production—they are sized to support non-recurring development activities. 

The  MAF  production  flow  has  been  optimized  for  low-cost  manufacturing  based 
on  lessons  learned  from  the  development  work  at  MSFC.  The  optimized  approach 
will be implemented at MAF and not retrofitted at MSFC. The Upper Stage manu-
facturing assets at MSFC are used for process development and production of early 
development  test  articles.  These  assets  cannot  support  flight  production  due  to  the 
developmental  nature  of  their  design.  The  MSFC  manufacturing  capability  will  be 
used  for  problem  resolution  after  the  Upper  Stage  production  system  is  established 
at MAF and will later transition to Ares V development activities. This plan is still 
undergoing  finalization  and  will  be  completed  this  fall  as  NASA  concludes  the 
Ares I PDR. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:59 Dec 17, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\77459.TXT JACKIE

